Table     of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Auto Industry Firms Receiving 
Employment Subsidies 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Keidanren Role Likely To Change Under 
New Chairman; FEATURE:  Welfare Payment Increases Will Offset Tax 
Cuts for Households; FEATURE:  Economic Organizations Critical of 
MITI 'Interference' 

   Environmental Issues - Thirty Small Industrial Waste Companies 
Form Cooperative 

   Financial Issues - Nippon Credit Bank Expanding, Introducing U.S. 
Techniques; Banks Considering Establishment of Offices in Hanoi; 
Former MOF Officials May Become Next BOJ Governor, Stock Exchange 
Head; MOF To Require Disclosure of 'Off-Balance Sheet' Transactions 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA -- Japanese Firms Forming 
Broad Range of Joint-Venture Companies 

   PHILIPPINES -- Shipping Firm Establishes Subsidiary in Manila 

   THAILAND -- Canon To Expand Office Automation Equipment 
Production 

   UNITED STATES -- Kobe Steel, TI To Market Cladding Material in 
Japan; Sumitomo Metal To Extend Technical Cooperation to Steel Rod 
Firm 

   VIETNAM -- Japanese Firm To Assist Marine Products Processing 
Company 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - MT Sales Fell 25 Percent in 1993, 
December Sales Dropped 16 Percent 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC Wins Supercomputer 
Order From Private University; Seiko Epson To Build IC Design-In 
Center in China 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - NEC, Mitsui To Build Ground 
Station For Sri Lanka Telecom; NHK Will Lease Circuit on Panamsat 
Satellite; Tokyo Experimental CATV Project To Be Operational by 
1996; Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., EO Revamp Production 
Agreement 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Shanghai Enterprise Ownership 
Composition Changes Through Reform; Textile Shortages, Price 
Increases Forecast in 1994; Bank of China To Introduce Computerized 
Service Network; Shenzhen Calls Halt to Listing of New 'A' Share 
Issues; Shandong Remains Country's Leading Gold Producer; Xiamen To 
Invest in Transport Facilities; Jialing To List Subsidiaries in Hong 
Kong 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Fujian Sets Up Intellectual 
Property Rights Court; Shanghai Exports Exceed Target in 1993; 
Guangzhou To Set Up Individual Foreign Exchange Markets; Foreign 
Investment Estimated at $30 Billion for 1993; Guangdong Foreign- 
Funded Enterprises Expand Export Share; Beijing Views Use of Foreign 
Loans, Donations; Hebei Use of 1993 Foreign Loans; Airbus Signs 
Spare Parts Production Deal; Aerospace Industry Corporation Seeks 
International Cooperation; Stanley Ho Threatens To Halt Mainland 
Investments; China Overseas To Invest in Guangdong Power Plant; Hong 
Kong Firm Holds Two Thirds Shares of Guangdong Power Plant; Xiamen 
People's Income, Foreign Capital Increase; Zhuhai, Singapore Company 
Sign Shipyard Construction Pact; Sino-Thai Project To Produce Suzuki 
Motorbikes in Nanning; Wuhan Iron and Steel Imports Spanish 
Machinery; Tianjin Establishes Joint-Venture Building Materials 
Institute 

   Taiwan:  Additional Incentives To Promote Southern Policy; Draft 
Trade Regulations on Hong Kong, Macao; Textile Companies To Invest 
or Expand in Vietnam; Government To Hold Current Tariffs on 
Automobiles, Parts for Now; Imposition of Anti-Dumping Tax on 
Japanese, Korean Polypropylene; MOEA Assesses Impact on 
Manufacturers of Joining GATT; Statistics on Exports to PRC May Be 
Underestimated 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  DPRK-Chosen Soren Joint Ventures Face 
Continuing Problems 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Patent Office Looks for Countermeasures 
to Patent Disputes; FEATURE:  ROK Efforts in Obtaining Foreign 
Commercial Technology Chronicled; FEATURE:  Electronics Companies 
Focusing on Large Screen TV's; Government Committee Devising NAFTA 
Countermeasures; Study Compares ROK and Japanese Overseas Investment 
Strategies; KDI Approves of Samsung's Entry Into Auto Production; 
Samsung Develops One-Chip Integrated Circuit; Hyundai Motors Opens 
Car Institute; Seoul, Beijing Seeking Industrial Alliance; Companies 
Withdraw From Indonesia Because of Rising Labor Costs; Plant Exports 
to China on Increase; Companies To Participate in Telephone Business 
in Russia; Goldstar Signs Communications Agreement With Romania; 
China Emerges as Major Export Market for ROK Textiles 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA - FEATURE:  Government Urged To Reduce 
Cost of Economy; FEATURE:  Workers Strike as Government Enforces 
Minimum Wage Decree; Central Bank Needs $400-Million 'Standby Loan'; 
Government Discontinues 'Protection' of Steel Industry; P.T. PAL To 
Shift Production Focus; Increase in French Investments Reported; 
Agriculture's Contribution to GDP Drops to 19 Percent 

   MALAYSIA:  Contract for Asia Pacific Cable Network Signed 

   PHILIPPINES:  Proposals for Satellite Project Reported 

   SINGAPORE:  'Largest' Petrochemical Investment Announced 

   THAILAND:  Rice Sale to North Korea Reported; Cabinet Approves 
Soybean Import 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Losses in Rice Export Earnings Reported; 
Government To Approve Foreign Construction of Infrastructure 
Projects; Government To Develop 'Core' Groups of State Enterprises; 
Banking Association To Include Domestic, Foreign Banks; Finance 
Ministry Personnel To Study Japan's Securities Industry; Joint 
Venture With French, Chinese Firms To Produce Nylon Cords; Jewelry 
Joint Venture Formed With Japanese Company; Joint Venture With 
Philippine Firm To Build Commercial Complex; Joint Venture With 
Singaporean Company To Provide Hotel Services; Joint Venture With 
Malaysian Firm To Produce Glass Containers; Decrease in Coal Export 
Noted; Singapore's Liang Court Holdings To Invest in Apartment 
Complex; Hanoi Launches First Paging Service; Hong Kong Firm To 
Invest in Da Lat Infrastructure; PetroVietnam To Increase 
Production; Government To Increase Cement Production; Peanut Exports 
Put Vietnam Third Among Exporting Countries; First Phase of Hoa Binh 
Hydroelectric Plant Completed; Rice Joint Venture Accord With Hong 
Kong Company Signed; Construction of Sulfuric Acid Factory Reported; 
Vietnam Airlines Leases Two Airbus Jets From Air France 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-05) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Auto Industry Firms Receiving 
Employment Subsidies -- SUMMARY:  Battered by Japan's prolonged 
economic slump, numerous firms in three auto industry sectors- 
-finished car makers, auto-body manufacturers, and auto parts 
makers--are temporarily shutting down operations and initiating 
"one-time layoffs," according to media reports.  An increasing 
number of large industry firms are joining smaller companies in 
receiving government "employment adjustment subsidies?? to offset 
labor costs associated with the layoffs. 

   According to the 6 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), Japan's 
auto industry is ??reeling?? from the fall in domestic demand for 
new cars because of the prolonged recession.  On 5 January, the 
Japan Automobile Dealers Association announced that domestic auto 
sales in 1993 fell for the third straight year to a six-year low. 
Sales of cars (excluding minicars), trucks, and buses totaled 
4,887,179 vehicles, down 8.4 percent from 1992, and the lowest level 
since 1987.  The paper adds that sales have fallen nearly 18 percent 
from their peak in 1990. 

   Auto exports also have fallen sharply.  According to the Japan 
Automobile Manufacturers Association, in January 1994 auto exports 
fell by 26.5 percent compared to January 1993 to 390,418 vehicles, 
the tenth consecutive monthly decline, the 25 February NIKKEI 
reports.  This is the largest drop "since statistics have been 
collected" and the lowest number of vehicles exported in the month 
of January since 1979.  Further, the monthly value of both auto and 
auto parts exports fell 12.6 percent to just over $6.5 billion, the 
fifth consecutive monthly decline, the paper notes. 

   Companies Forced To Initiate Temporary Layoffs - According to the 
20 November 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN, because of the prolonged slump, the 
auto industry is faced with "excess personnel and production 
capacity."  However, given Japan's lifetime employment system, 
companies are unable to simply fire workers and are looking for 
other means to lower labor costs.  One means companies have resorted 
to, according to ASAHI, is "one-time," or temporary layoffs.  Under 
this arrangement, to reduce production without actually firing 
excess personnel, firms require that designated workers take 
temporary layoffs, during which plant operations are halted.  Firms 
must pay an "operations shutdown allowance" equal to or more than 60 
percent of the employee's average salary, as required by the Labor 
Standards Law. 

   To help firms in selected industries during recessionary 
downturns, in 1975 the Japanese Government initiated an "employment 
adjustment subsidy system" through which the Ministry of Labor (MOL) 
pays companies a subsidy to offset labor costs "during temporary 
layoffs, retraining, and employee transfers," ASAHI notes.  To 
receive these subsidies, firms must first be "designated" as being 
in an industry sector experiencing difficulties by the MOL, after 
which the firm must specify the conditions of its temporary layoffs 
and petition the MOL for the subsidies.  This designation is 
effective for 1 year, after which the industry may be redesignated 
by the MOL for another year. 

   Large Number of Industry Firms Receiving Employment Subsidies - 
In the auto industry, the auto-body manufacturing sector received 
MOL certification for employment adjustment subsidies in late 
January 1993, according to the 6 February 1993 NIKKEI, following an 
appeal by the Japan Auto-Body Industries Association, which 
represents 218 firms.  The MOL eligibility designation was set to 
expire on 31 January 1994, but, according to the 15 February 1994 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the MOL "redesignated" the auto-body sector 
for another year.  On 1 May 1993 the finished auto assembly sector 
and the auto parts manufacturing sector were also added to MOL's 
list of industries eligible for employment adjustment subsidies, 
according to the 3 May 1993 NIKKEI WEEKLY. 

   Since the designations were made, the number of companies 
utilizing one-time layoffs has been increasing, reports the 15 
February 1994 NIKKEI SANGYO.  According to MOL statistics, the 
number of finished car makers (including some auto-body assembly 
firms) who petitioned for labor adjustment subsidies to pay for 
temporary shutdowns and layoffs mushroomed in late 1993, from five 
firms in November to 21 in December covering 26,785 employees.  As 
these firms halted production, in a ripple effect, an increasing 
number of auto-body and auto parts firms have had to initiate work 
stoppages, NIKKEI SANGYO reports.  The number of auto-body firms 
undertaking work stoppages in November expanded to 12 and then to 20 
firms, while the number of targeted personnel increased from 990 to 
1,515. 

   Auto Parts Firms Particularly Hard Hit - Auto parts manufacturing 
firms have been particularly hard hit by the downturn, according to 
the 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO.  The number of parts companies 
planning work stoppages more than doubled, from 136 firms in October 
to 280 in November, while the number of employees involved jumped 
from 30,382 in October to 79,201 in November.  Further, according to 
the 15 February NIKKEI SANGYO, the numbers increased again from 
November to December, from 280 to 361 firms.  NIKi?I SANGY0 adds 
                                                 ? 
that the finished car and auto parts industries do not expect the 
number of firms requesting subsidies to fall "any time soon." 
Press Reports on Companies Initiating Layoffs, Requesting 
Subsidies - Although a number of small auto industry firms applied 
for subsides soon after the MOL made its designations, until October 
1993 no major company had applied.  Subsequently, a number of larger 
auto-related firms plans to initiate temporary layoffs and apply for 
employment adjustment subsidies.  According to press reports, the 
following companies have initiated temporary layoffs and have 
received employment adjustment subsidies: 

   Nissan Motor Co.--According the 26 October MAINICHI SHIMBUN, 
Nissan announced plans to apply for subsidies after revealing that 
it would stop production for two days in November on one line at its 
Tochigi assembly plant, which employs 6,500 people, and institute 
temporary layoffs on those days to 2,100 production workers.  In 
November, Nissan announced it would expand the scope of temporary 
layoffs to include "virtually all" domestic production lines.  The 
18 November MAINICHI SHIMBUN reports that Nissan decided to target 
nearly 15,000 employees and five plants for two-day shutdowns in 
December, which would cut production by nearly 4,000 vehicles. 

   In December, Nissan announced it would continue to conduct 
temporary layoffs and production shutdowns in January and February, 
according to the 18 December YOMIURI SHIMBUN.  In January, Nissan 
had shutdowns for three days at its Murayama and Yokohama plants, 
two days at its Tochigi plant, and one day at its Kyushu plant.  In 
February the company planned layoffs for two days at its Tochigi and 
Kyushu plants and one day at the Murayama plant.  According to 
YOMIURI, the Murayama plant will have been closed six days during 
four consecutive months of temporary shutdowns. 

   Mazda Motor Corp.--According to the 26 October MAINICHI, Mazda 
decided to initiate temporary layoffs of two days in November for 
25,000 of its nearly 30,000 employees throughout the country. 
MAINICHI reports that Mazda also applied for employment adjustment 
subsidies.  The 25 December Y0MIURI SHIMBUN reports that Mazda, 
following its November layoffs, planned to have four days of layoffs 
in January at its Hofu plant.  Mazda, which is heavily dependent on 
exports, has seen its sales fall for fourteen consecutive months. 

   Nissan Diesel Motor--According to the 23 November 1993 NIKKEI, 
Nissan Diesel, a heavy-duty truck and bus manufacturer, announced it 
would initiate two days of temporary layoffs involving nearly 3,700 
employees at three different plants.  The company also stated it 
would apply for government employment adjustment subsidies, and also 
announced it had reached agreement with its labor unions to cut 
yearend bonuses. 

   Sumitomo Wiring Systems--The 26 January 1994 CHUBU SHIMBUN 
reports that Sumitomo Wiring Systems, the third largest manufacturer 
of auto wire harnesses, will initiate one-day shutdowns in February 
and March, affecting more than 4,700 employees.  The firm plans to 
apply for employment adjustment subsidies from the MOL.  The 
shutdowns will cover all of the company's offices and eight plants 
in Japan.  It has seen orders for wire harnesses, which account for 
over 90 percent of total sales, plummet nearly 20 percent since 
1990.  If orders do not recover soon, the firm may extend its 
planned shutdowns beyond March. 

   Tsuchiya Manufacturing Co.--According to the 24 January 1994 
NIKKEI SANGYO, Tsuchiya, an auto parts maker affiliated with Nissan, 
plans to stop production for two days a month at its main plant in 
Kawasaki City.  During this time, the salary of full-time employees 
will be covered by employment adjustment subsidies, but the salaries 
of temporary and part-time employees will be reduced on a prorated 
basis.  The Kawasaki plant, which among other things produces fuel, 
oil, and air filters, accounts for nearly one-third the firm's total 
sales.  The work stoppages will continue "until demand for auto 
parts has recovered," according to company officials.  Further, the 
company is considering work stoppages at other plants where 
productivity is low. 

   Other Suppliers Receiving Subsidies Under Different Designations 
- Other major suppliers to the auto industry have resorted to 
temporary layoffs and have accepted employment adjustment subsidies 
under other industry designations.  Two major examples, from the 
rubber and steel industry, are as follows: 

   Bridgestone Corp.--The 3 December 1993 NIKKEI reports that 
Bridgestone, the world's second largest tire manufacturer, announced 
that it would initiate three and four days of temporary layoffs at 
the end of December at nine of the its ten tire plants in Japan. 
The firm will also apply for subsidies.  Layoffs could cover 9,500 
employees, or nearly 60 percent of the firm's total payroll. 

   According to NIKKEI, the tire industry received its MOL 
designation at the end of November, and "this is the first time 
temporary layoffs have taken place in the tire industry."  Earlier, 
Bridges tone decreased the number of operating days from seven to 
five per week, but even this measure failed to compensate for the 
"severe" drop in demand for tires. 

   Daido Steel Co.--The world's largest maker of specialty steel and 
a major supplier to the auto industry, particularly to Nissan, Daido 
announced it would receive subsidies for temporary layoffs of nearly 
4,000 personnel at four plants at the end of December and in early 
January, according to the 11 December 1993 YOMIURI SHIMBUN (Chubu 
edition).  While the firm had undertaken temporary layoffs at its 
Kawasaki plant, this is its first "large-scale" employment 
adjustment.  Daido's sales have fallen for three consecutive years. 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Keidanren Role Likely To Change Under 
New Chairman -- SUMMARY:  On 7 February the Federation of Economic 
Organizations (Keidanren) selected Shoichiro Toyoda, chairman of 
Toyota Motor Corp., to succeed Gaishi Hiraiwa as Keidanren chairman, 
according to press reports.  While Toyoda chairs Japan's largest 
manufacturing firm, some industrial leaders express concern whether 
he can successfully lead Japanese industry because of his 
personality and Toyota's unusual corporate culture.  The press 
anticipates that under Toyoda's leadership, Keidanren will become an 
ordinary economic organization" representing the interests of 
private business, rather than acting as a coordinator between 
politicians, bureaucrats, and the business community. 

   On 7 February Keidanren chose Shoichiro Toyoda (68 years old), 
chairman of Toyota Motor Corp. and a Keidanren vice president, to 
succeed Gaishi Hiraiwa when he steps down as Keidanren chairman in 
May, according to the 8 February NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  (The 
company name is rendered "Toyota"; the legal family name is 
"Toyoda.")  While industrial leaders generally welcomed Toyoda's 
selection, they also expressed concern, based on his background as 
the owner and chairman of Toyota Motor, according to the 8 February 
MAINICHI SHIMBUN.  The 8 February NIKKEI SANGYO quotes an 
unidentified industrial leader as questioning Toyoda's ability to 
break free from "Toyota egoism" and lead Japanese industry from a 
"broader viewpoint."  Writing in the 10 February NIKKEI SANGYO, 
editorial staff writer Atsushi Suemura asks whether the head of 
Toyota, which is often said to have a "Mikawa (the old name for 
Aichi Prefecture) Monroe doctrine--we don't interfere with you, so 
don't you interfere with us"--is qualified to lead the entirety of 
Japanese industries. 

   The 8 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reports on the 
expectations--"which also reflect the concerns "--industrial leaders 
have concerning Toyoda.  Masaru Hayami, chairman of Japan's 
Association of Corporate Executives (Keizai Doyukai), states that he 
wants Toyoda to exhibit strong leadership "apart from the interests 
of the auto industry."  Kosaku Inaba, chairman of the Japan Chamber 
of Commerce and Industry, says that the key lies in "how well Toyoda 
can balance" the interests of various industries and the interests 
of consumers and corporate shareholders, not as the manager of 
Toyota Motor, which has "always defended the interests of Toyota and 
the auto industry," but as a leader of all industries. 

   Concerning Japan-U.S. trade issues, Yoshinari Yamashiro, chairman 
of steel firm NKK Corp., notes that Japan-U.S. friction "is the 
Japan-U.S. automobile problem," according to the 8 February NIKKEI, 
implying that Toyota Motor should change its corporate philosophy 
and behavior to ease Japan-U.S. trade friction.  The article adds 
that Toyota Motor "symbolizes" Japan's large trade surplus. 

   Where Will Keidanren Go Under Toyoda's Leadership? - Writing in 
the 15 January ASAHI, economic reporter Yomei Tsuji speculates that 
Keidanren may become an "ordinary economic organization" under 
Toyoda's leadership.  Tsuji assumes that Keidanren will abandon its 
function of channelling corporate political contributions to the 
political parties.  Since Toyota Motor has devoted itself to 
manufacturing and selling cars from its Aichi Prefecture base and 
has avoided involvement in politics in Tokyo, Tsuji expects Toyoda 
to be effective in "changing Keidanren's relationship with 
politicians." 

   In addition, unlike previous Keidanren chairmen who came from the 
steel, heavy machinery, or electric power industries, industry 
sectors which were "sponsored" by the government, Toyoda is a 
representative of "true" private sector firms in Japan.  A change in 
Keidanren's chairmanship from a leader of state-sponsored industry 
to a private industry leader, Tsuji maintains, means that Japan's 
economy has been "taken from the government's hands."  He also notes 
that since Toyoda comes from the auto industry, which must sell to 
consumers directly, Keidanren under Toyoda is expected to pay more 
attention to consumer interests, unlike his predecessors, who spoke 
about "national interests" as leaders of "Japan Inc." 

   Writing in the 8 February NIKKEI, editorial staff writer Kazuo 
Mori notes that Toyoda's Keidanren will no longer play the role of 
coordinating interests between industry, the politicians, and 
bureaucrats.  Indeed, now it will be difficult for Keidanren to 
coordinate interests even within private industry.  Mori notes that 
Toyota is an "owner-managed firm, which tends to compete fiercely 
and to pursue only its own interests,'' even though it has become a 
giant."  He observes that the Keidanren's selection of Toyoda 
indicates that "competition based on market principles" will be 
emphasized by corporations more than ever.  Japanese practices that 
hinder competition, Mori notes, such as implementing policies 
through discussions among political, bureaucratic, and industrial 
circles, "will be avoided." 

   Press Urges Toyoda's Keidanren To Promote Deregulation - On 7 and 
8 February, NIKKEI, SANKEI SHIMBUN, ASAHI, MAINICHI, and YOMIURI 
carried editorials on Toyoda's selection.  All the editorials urge 
Keidanren under Toyoda's leadership to promote deregulation.  For 
example, ASAHI points out that Japan's auto industry has grown to 
the level of the U.S. auto industry because of "self-initiated 
technical innovations and rationalization efforts," not by support 
from the government, and urges Toyoda to "boldly promote 
deregulation."  MAINICHI, noting that Toyoda himself was a member of 
the Hiraiwa Study Group, urges him to take the initiative in 
pressing the government to implement the Hiraiwa Report and "further 
promote deregulation."  YOMIURI also asks Toyoda to promote 
deregulation to change Japan's economic structure, under which 
corporations compete for market share or conduct business in a 
collusive manner." 

   SANKEI's editorial notes that Keidanren also must change its role 
of being a coordinator between government and industry to being "a 
representative of private companies."  Through channelling corporate 
contributions to the Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) the past 40 
years, Keidanren has "directly and indirectly influenced government 
policy formulation," but it now has to "deal directly with 
government regulators."    The editorial urges the Keidanren under 
Toyoda "not be passive" toward the government concerning regulations 
and administrative guidance, but rather "assert its opinions and act 
as the leader of private firms in protecting private sector 
vitality." 

   Profiles Note Similarities Between Toyoda, Hosokawa - The 17 
January CHUNICHI SHIMBUN points out the many similarities between 
Toyoda and Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa, such as being from a 
well-known family, from a regional city, and "somewhat amateurs in 
their respective new fields," but also observing that "the era 
requires such leaders."  Toyoda is from a rich family--the eldest 
grandson of Toyota founder Sakichi Toyoda--and has reached his 
current position "without any political or financial support from 
the outside."  He is viewed as an honest and sincere person, the 
paper notes, "but not a tactician or a charismatic leader."  Since 
he has been far removed from Tokyo, Toyoda reputedly has not been 
involved in politics and "is not close to a political party or 
politicians."  He is also viewed as an "amateur" industrial leader, 
because he had not been involved in the activities of any economic 
organization before becoming a Keidanren vice chairman in 1990. 
Toyoda has a doctorate in mechanical engineering and is an 
accomplished engineer. 

   According to the 8 February CHUNICHI, Toyoda's stances on various 
issues are as follows: 

--Political contributions:  Toyoda thinks politicians should receive 
government support and individual contributions rather than 
contributions from business.  He realizes this will "disconnect" 
collusion within in the so-called "iron triangle" of politicians, 
bureaucrats and corporations. 

--Japan-U.S. trade:  Toyoda believes that Japan and the United 
States should build a trade relationship based on "harmony and 
competition."  He has opposed setting numerical targets for Japan's 
imports of automobiles and auto parts. 

--Economic structural reform:  He believes that corporations should 
promote self-help efforts to restructure themselves as their own 
responsibility, while the government should make the Japanese market 
more open and fair by deregulation. 

   FEATURE:  Welfare Payment Increases Will Offset Tax Cuts for 
Households -- SUMMARY:  Japan's proposed increases in welfare and 
national annuity premium rates will lessen the stimulative effects 
of the government's proposed income tax cuts on the consumption of 
working households, according to press reports.  The total increase 
in premium payments is estimated to be equivalent to one-fourth the 
total estimated gain in disposable income from the income tax cuts, 
thus largely offsetting tax cuts for average-income working 
households.  The Ministry of Health and Welfare (MHW) claims, on the 
other hand, that retirees will receive annuity increases that 
slightly exceed the total amount of premium increases. 

   The MHW has drafted a bill to reform the welfare annuity program 
(for private sector wage earners) and the national annuity program 
(for the self-employed, students, and people without jobs) which 
includes premium rate increases in FY94, according to the 18 
February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI). The draft bill will be 
submitted to the Diet in mid-March for deliberation.  According to 
the MHW draft, the welfare annuity premium rate will increase from 
the current 14.5 percent (split equally between employer and 
employee) to 16.5 percent of monthly salaries effective in October 
1994, increasing to 17.35 percent effective October 1995, and a new 
payment of 1.0 percent (split between employer and employee) of each 
bonus payment effective in April 1995.  Regarding the national 
annuity premium, the current premium amount, which is a fixed 10,500 
yen ($100), will be raised to 11,100 yen ($106) per month effective 
April 1994. 

   The 26 February NIKKEI reports that total welfare and national 
annuity premium payments by working households will increase by 1.4 
trillion yen ($13.3 billion) a year, which is nearly equivalent to 
one-fourth the estimated 5.5 trillion yen ($52.4 billion) in income 
tax cuts specified in the 8 February economic stimulus package. 
According to MHW's calculations cited by NIKKEI, the total amount of 
welfare annuity premiums will increase by approximately 2.6 trillion 
yen ($24.8 billion) a year, assuming an average worker's monthly 
salary of 340,000 yen ($3,200) and 33 million wage earners.  Of this 
2.6 trillion yen ($24.8 billion), 1.3 trillion yen ($12.4 billion) 
will be paid by wage earners, since employers and employees equally 
split premium payments.  The MHW also anticipates that total 
national annuity premiums will increase by 100 billion yen ($952 
million) a year. 

   Premium Hikes Will Wipe Out Tax Cut Gains for Average-Income 
Families - According to the 15 February NIKKEI, working households 
with annual incomes below 6 million yen ($57,000) will realize 
little benefit from the income tax cuts due to increases in annuity 
premium payments and other public levies.  Moreover, while the 
income tax cuts are only for FY94, the premium increases "will be 
permanent."  In the case of a household with an annual income of 6 
million yen ($57,000) or below, an income tax cut of around 71,400 
yen ($680) or less "will be largely offset by the increased welfare 
annuity premium payments."  Although the MHW claims that welfare 
annuity recipients over 60 years of age will receive 5 percent more 
in benefits from FY94, and therefore the total household disposable 
income will increase by 3 trillion yen ($28.6 billion), NIKKEI 
argues that incomes will increase "at the cost of increased burdens 
for all working households." 

   More broadly, the NIKKEI article notes that FY94 may be a "losing 
year" for working class households with children in school, since 
postal rates have recently increased; a 9-percent increase in 
national university tuition has been proposed for 1995; and an 
increase in Tokyo expressway tolls has been proposed.  The paper 
concludes that even when workers want to have a bottle of beer after 
a hard day's work, a 8.9 yen ($.08) tax increase per bottle will 
"hurt their thin wallets." 

   FEATURE:  Economic Organizations Critical of MITI 'Interference' 
-- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
reportedly faxed a memorandum to four major private economic 
organizations summarizing the "important points" of the latest 
government economic stimulus package as well as "model comments" to 
be made by the heads of the four organizations before the Hosokawa 
Cabinet approved the package on 8 February, according to press 
reports.  A NIH0N KEIZAI SHIMBUN article on 15 February reported 
that the economic organizations were very critical of MITI's 
"interference" concerning comments by their leaders.  An editorial 
in that newspaper the same day sharply criticizes MITI for 
"excessive guidance" of the private sector, observing that it is 
"quite ironic" that under the Hosokawa administration, which 
advocates deregulation, the bureaucrats' control of the private 
sector "appears to have been strengthened." 

   Major economic organizations are very critical of MITI's 
"interference" concerning comments by their leaders on government 
economic policies, according to the 15 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  MITI reportedly faxed a memorandum summarizing the 
"important points" of the latest government economic stimulus 
package and "model comments" to the offices of four leading private 
sector economic organizations--the Federation of Economic 
Organizations (Keidanren); the Japanese Association of Corporate 
Executives (Keizai Doyukai); the Japan Federation of Employers' 
Association (Nikkeiren); and the Japan Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry--on the afternoon of 8 February, a few hours before the 
Hosokawa Cabinet approved the stimulus package.  The fax reportedly 
emphasized the "importance" of "praising measures like the income 
tax cut" and "supporting the government's policy" of cutting direct 
taxes and increasing indirect taxes.  According to the NIKKEI 
article, the "model comments" for use by the heads of the four 
economic organizations included:  "We highly praise the courageous 
decisions of the government and coalition to include an income tax 
cut in the stimulus package." 

   Although MITI defended its action with the assertion that it 
never intended to force" the organizations to use MITI's comments, 
NIKKEI reports that the economic organizations are "annoyed" by the 
fax, which "sounded like an order" for them to use MITI's comments. 
The article notes that "this is the first instance" of MITI actually 
sending a document instructing the economic organizations what to 
say, although in the past MITI telephoned them to request that they 
make comments "favorable" to MITI. 

   According to a "source connected with an economic organization" 
cited by NIKKEI, "bureaucratic interference" concerning comments by 
leaders of the economic organizations "assumed prominence" in 
December 1993, when Jiro Saito, Ministry of Finance vice minister, 
and Hideaki Kumano, MITI vice minister, visited the four 
organizations to "explain" the government's policy of income tax 
cuts to be paid for by increases in the consumption tax. 

   Editorial Blasts Fax as Example of MITI's 'Excessive Guidance' - 
NIKKEI's 15 February editorial, which is headlined "Appalled by 
MITI's Excessive Guidance," is very critical of MITI, noting that 
its fax "reminds us of an 'education mama' teaching a two-year-old 
with simple words."  However, it observes, "the postwar period, in 
which Japanese industries were rebuilt under strong MITI guidance, 
has already ended."  "MITI's excessive guidance," the editorial 
continues, is an "extreme anachronism."  "MITI may think that it can 
freely control private economic organizations with its guidance, but 
such presumptuousness is no longer acceptable."  The editorial urges 
MITI to "realize that excessive guidance is now one of the causes 
hindering the vitality of Japanese industries." 

   The editorial also points out that MITI's fax "may be cited by 
the U.S. Government" to prove its assertion that "bureaucrats 
control the Japanese economy."  It notes that during the recent 
Japan-U.S. framework talks, the U.S. Government criticized Japanese 
bureaucrats for "controlling the Japanese economy and hindering 
deregulation." 

   The editorial concludes that it is "quite ironic" that under the 
Hosokawa administration, which advocates deregulation, bureaucrats 
"are gaining more power" and their control of the private sector 
"appears to have been strengthened."  The editorial demands that 
MITI "reflect gravely on its conduct." 

   Environmental Issues - Thirty Small Industrial Waste Companies 
Form Cooperative -- About 30 small-scale manufacturers of industrial 
waste treatment equipment and industrial waste disposal companies 
from the Tokyo Metropolitan Area and Nagano, Kanagawa, and Shizuoka 
Prefectures have joined together to form a cooperative association 
which will pursue contracts for building final industrial waste 
disposal facilities and conducting R and D activities.  The 
"Cooperative Association for Promoting Environment-Related 
Enterprises" will be established with an investment of 10 million 
yen ($96,000) and will be chaired by Yoshinori Ito, president of 
Kankyo Seibi Shinko, an environmental equipment firm. 

   The companies decided to form this "unique" cooperative because 
as independent firms, each has limited financial resources and thus 
can not qualify for special programs sponsored by public 
corporations, such as the Japan Environment Corporation, to finance 
work for improving disposal facilities to conform with stricter 
environmental regulations.  The cooperative plans to expand its 
membership to about 1,000 companies and establish a network of 
branch chapters throughout the country.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
17 Feb 94 p 12) 

   Financial Issues - Nippon Credit Bank Expanding, Introducing U.S. 
Techniques -- Nippon Credit Bank (NCB), the newest and smallest of 
Japan's three long-term credit banks, has established a wholly-owned 
trust banking subsidiary that will begin operations in April 1994, 
according to the 1 March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  It will be the 
seventh financial institution, after the "big four" securities 
companies and two banks, to enter the trust banking business through 
a financial subsidiary.  Capitalized at 5 billion yen ($48 million) 
and with 15 employees, the new subsidiary will begin buying real- 
estate trusts and bank loans for resale. 

   NCB also established a "financial development division" within 
its Planning Department in February to engage in real-estate project 
finance and asset securitization, according to the 18 February 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The new division will offer advice to customers on 
how to securitize their assets through trust banking or by setting 
up special-purpose companies, and will introduce the securitized 
products to its large bank bond purchasing customers.  For now the 
division will focus on assisting in the securitization of a 
customer's better assets, but in the future it will expand to 
nonperforming loans, as is done by U.S. investment banks. 

   Establishing the new division is NCB's first step in expanding 
commission-earning operations that fully exploit the financial 
engineering techniques used by U.S. investment banks.  The new 
division will work in concert with NCB's new trust bank subsidiary 
in promoting business.  By bringing its customers financial 
engineering techniques from the United States, "smooth fund-raising 
will become possible" for real estate  financing. 

   In addition, NCB is also building up its system of developing new 
derivative products, such as options, futures and swaps, by 
establishing a product-development team, according to the 25 
February NIKKEI KINYU.  The team's objective is to facilitate 
product development by addressing the need of institutional 
investors and average companies to hedge against interest rate and 
currency risks.  The team will be located at NCB's interest-rate 
swap trading desk, the first time a long-term credit bank has set up 
a product-development team at a trading desk.  Product development 
and marketing will be streamlined, with a single person in charge of 
both. This official will concentrate on developing products for the 
portfolio management of manufacturers, not Just securities and 
insurance companies. 

   Although many banks separate their dealing sites and development 
divisions, product development is easier at a trading desk because 
there dealers can collect the hedging know-how of major commercial 
and foreign banks.  NCB expects to be able to reduce the time it 
takes to develop a product, such as swap-related products, from 
design to completion in half the time this took previously.  NCB 
plans to sell these products not only to institutional investors but 
also to average companies. 

   Banks Considering Establishment of Offices in Hanoi - Several 
Japanese commercial banks are considering opening offices in Hanoi. 
The Bank of Tokyo, Sakura Bank, Fuji Bank, Tokai Bank, and Daiwa 
Bank, which have already opened representative offices in Ho Chi 
Minh City, have also begun looking into opening offices in Hanoi, 
Vietnam's financial administration center.  These banks are expected 
to set up operations in Hanoi "in the next two or three years" in 
response to the growing number of foreign banks opening offices in 
both cities.  Sanwa and Sumitomo banks, which are planning to open 
representative offices in Ho Chi Minh City in the spring of 1994, 
are expected to join the others in establishing Hanoi offices in the 
future. 

   The banks are considering several ways of establishing bases in 
Hanoi, including establishing representative offices, local offices, 
or liaison offices of their Ho Chi Minh City representative offices. 
Of the 30 or more non-Japanese foreign banks that have begun 
operations in Vietnam, roughly one-third have bases in both cities 
in the form of a branch offices, representative offices, or local 
offices.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 16 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Former MOF Officials May Become Next BOJ Governor, Stock Exchange 
Head - Mitsuhide Yamaguchi, president of the Export-Import Bank of 
Japan (Ex-Im Bank), who entered the Ministry of Finance (MOF) in 
1951 and rose to  become vice minister in 1984, is rumored to be the 
probable candidate to succeed Bank of Japan (BOJ) Governor Yasushi 
Mieno in December 1994 when Mieno's term ends.  In recent years the 
BOJ governorship has alternated between former MOF vice ministers 
and BOJ "careerists."  Since Mieno is a BOJ careerist, the next 
governor is likely to be a former MOF vice minister.  Although 
appointing the BOJ governor is the prerogative of the prime 
minister, the incumbent MOF vice minister customarily recommends a 
candidate to the prime minister, who "almost automatically 
approves." 

   Although Yamaguchi is rumored to be the probable candidate, the 
MOF, BOJ and banking industry officials "are not completely sure 
yet."  They question whether the Hosokawa administration will last 
until December, when Mieno steps down, and if Prime Minister 
Morihiro Hosokawa's "advocacy of reforms" might lead to changes in 
the selection process.  There have been several instances in the 
past where the personal desires of prime ministers altered the 
selection process.  One example was Prime Minister Masayoshi Ohira's 
selection of Haruo Maekawa, then vice president of the Ex-Im Bank, 
over MOF candidate Satoshi Sumita, president of the Ex-Im Bank at 
that time.  As a result, Sumita had to wait for five years before 
getting his chance. 

   BOJ officials have been resistant to the custom whereby every 
second BOJ governor is a former MOF vice minister.  A senior BOJ 
official is quoted as saying that the BOJ governor needs to have a 
"sustainable and medium-term viewpoint" of the economy and be strong 
enough to implement monetary policies from such a viewpoint, 
"regardless of what the public at large may say," implying that 
being a former MOF vice minister in itself is not a sufficient 
qualification to be BOJ governor.  Some banking industry officials 
are also concerned that former MOF bureaucrats tend to compromise 
too easily with politicians.  They are also concerned that former 
MOF officials tend to adhere to MOF--not BOJ--"priorities" and 
subject monetary policy to the MOF's fiscal objectives. 
Yoshino Rumored To Be Next TSE Board Chairman - Yoshihiko 
Yoshino, president of the Japan Development Bank, who entered the 
MOF in 1953 and became vice minister in 1986, most likely will 
succeed Minoru Nagaoka, chairman of the Tokyo Stock Exchange (TSE) 
Board of Directors, when Nagaoka steps down in May.  The 
chairmanship has been filled by former MOP vice ministers since 
1965, when the TSE invited former MOF vice minister Teiichiro 
Morinaga to restore financial health to the securities industry 
following the so-called "securities recession" of the mid-1960's. 
Since likely candidates from within the securities industry have 
been tainted by the stock-loss compensation scandals of 1991, it is 
highly likely that a former MOF vice minister will become the next 
TSE chairman.  Nagaoka has been quoted as saying that since current 
MOF Vice Minister Jiro Saito "plans and decides personnel moves of 
all former MOF bureaucrats," Saito will select a candidate from 
among the available former MOF vice ministers.  Then, the candidate 
will be nominated by the TSE Board of Directors and officially 
elected by two-thirds of all TSE members. 

   Within the securities industry, however, there is strong 
resistance to the chairmanship becoming a "reserved seat" for former 
MOF vice ministers.  The president of a major securities house 
states that "the securities industry is now capable of voluntarily 
promoting fairness and transparency in the stock market," so that 
the industry "no longer needs influential MOF retirees."  Another 
reason for the strong resistance is that the securities industry was 
not happy with Nagaoka, who, in the industry's view, "adopted the 
MOF's position," rather than representing the securities industry, 
during the series of securities scandals that began in 1991.  This 
viewpoint was particularly evident concerning the issue of 
establishing a securities industry watchdog organization.  Nagaoka 
supported the MOF's idea of establishing the Securities Exchange 
Surveillance Commission within the MOF, instead of an independent 
organization similar to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, 
which the industry sought.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 17 Feb 94 p 11) 

   MOF To Require Disclosure of 'Off-Balance Sheet' Transactions - 
The Ministry of Finance (MOF) has decided to require financial 
institutions to disclose information on the status of their so- 
called "off-balance sheet" transactions.  The MOF has determined 
that the nontransparency of financial transactions not currently 
included in a financial institution's balance sheet--so-called "off- 
balance sheet" transactions," such as unlisted futures, swaps, and 
options--and the concomitant risk of such transactions can cause 
enormous instability to the Japanese financial system as a whole. 
Consequently the MOF will reconvene its special advisory panel in 
March to study the issue in detail. 

   "Off-balance sheet" transactions use cutting-edge financial 
engineering techniques to allow financial institutions to hedge 
against risk.  Compared to more traditional financial instruments 
such as loans, off-balance-sheet transactions are conducive to 
large-volume trading across national borders and have a 
destabilizing effect internationally when a contract default occurs. 
Overseas off-balance-sheet transactions of Japanese financial 
institutions are said to be ballooning, which is one reason why the 
Bank for International Settlements (BIS) is calling for their 
thorough disclosure and methods of managing the concomitant risks. 

   Some of the issues the MOF advisory committee, "The Working 
Subcommittee on Financial Institution Disclosure," will consider 
are:  whether it can establish a means for market-value assessment 
of unlisted "off-balance-sheet" financial products; whether risk 
assessment of all counterparts to off-balance-sheet transactions and 
comprehensive risk assessment are possible; whether overseas 
transactions are to be disclosed as well; and whether there is a 
method to demonstrate risk management methods that financial 
institutions are already using.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 24 Feb 
94 p 1) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Japanese Firms Forming 
Broad Range of Joint-Venture Companies -- Japanese economic 
newspapers in recent weeks have reported the formation of joint 
venture (JV) companies and other corporate tie-ups in China that 
involve a wide range of industrial sectors. 

   Manufacturing Sector - Nippon Alkyl Phenol, a Japan-based JV 
company organized by Mitsui Petrochemical Industries, the Swiss 
chemical company Ciba-Geigy, and Musashino-Geigy, will sign an 
agreement in the near future with Gaoqiao Petrochemical Company, a 
major Chinese petrochemical manufacturer, establishing a JV company 
in Shanghai to build a plant to manufacture a resin additive which 
uses alkyl phenol as a feedstock.  The investment ratio in the JV 
will be Nippon Alkyl Phenol 75 percent and Gaoqiao Petrochemical 25 
percent. 

   The new company will invest 10 billion yen ($95.2 million) to 
build a resin additive plant in South China with an annual capacity 
of 2,500 tons.  The alkyl phenol used in the production of the 
additive, which is an antioxidant and ultraviolet radiation 
absorbing agent used in resins such as acrylonitrile butadiene 
styrene, will be shipped from Nippon Alkyl Phenol's plant located in 
Mitsui Petrochemical's Chiba plant complex.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 7 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Shiko Technical Research--The world's largest manufacturer of 
cooling fans used in notebook computers, Shiko has begun full-scale 
operations at two JV plants in China.  The factories, located in 
Shanghai and Wenzhou, Zhejiang Province, were completed in December 
1993 and employ about 100 workers each.  Shiko projects that sales 
in FY94 from the two plants will be 1-2 billion yen ($9.5-$19 
million), which would about double their FY93 sales of 1.4 billion 
yen ($13.3 million). 

   The Shanghai plant will produce cooling fans for personal 
computers and sell them to major electronics manufacturers in 
Taiwan.  Production will be contracted out to the Shanghai Video 
Recorder Equipment Factory until Shiko officially decides on a 
partner in May.  The Wenzhou JV plant, the "Wenzhou Golden Dragon 
Shiko Company," will make vibration motors for pagers which will be 
sold to Motorola and to Casio Computer's plant in Tianjin.  The JV 
partner will be an individual.  With the establishment of these 
foreign production bases, Shiko will implement a policy of "domestic 
production for domestic sales and foreign production for foreign 
sales."  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 16 Feb 94 p 26) 

   Juken Sangyo, a second-tier manufacturer of processed wood 
products, together with the general trading company Nissho Iwai, 
will establish a wood products manufacturing and sales JV company in 
Shanghai in April.  The company, Juken Nissho China, will be 
capitalized at $5 million, with Juken investing 85 percent and 
Nissho Iwai 15 percent.  The JV has obtained a 50-year lease from 
the Chinese Government on a 5-hectare site in Shanghai's Baoshan 
District.  Total investment, including plant and equipment, will be 
about $10 million.  The JV plant, scheduled to begin operation in 
February 1995, will use imported wood from Southeast Asian countries 
such as Myanmar, will cut lumber, and will manufacture plywood for 
export to Japan and for sale in China.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
16 Feb 94 p 19) 

   Engineering Design, Transport, and Printing Services - Mitsubishi 
Heavy Industries (MHI) and Mitsubishi Corp. will establish a JV 
company on 1 April with the Baoshan Iron and Steel Co. to carry out 
the design work for Baoshan's No. 2 rolling mill.  The JV 
company, "Shanghai Bao-Mitsu Metallurgical Facilities Engineering 
Technology Co. Ltd.," will be capitalized at about 200 million yen 
($1.9 million), with the Japanese firms investing 50 percent and 
Baoshan 50 percent.  The rolling mill, scheduled to be completed by 
1996, is part of Baoshan's third-phase construction.  A consortium 
of seven Japanese companies, including MHI, Mitsubishi Corp., and 
Nippon Steel, won the third-phase contract in November 1993.  MHI is 
also establishing a JV company with Sumitomo Metal Industries in 
Chongqing, Szechuan, to design an electric continuous casting steel 
mill.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 10 Feb 94 p 10) 

   Nippon Konpo Unyu Soko, a Japanese transportation company, 
together with the China Foreign Transport Nanjing Company, in late 
February established a JV transport company, Nanjing Nikkon Storage 
and Transport Co. Ltd.  The JV will be will be capitalized at $3 
million, with Nippon Konpo investing 51 percent and the Chinese firm 
49 percent.  The JV agreement will be for 20 years.  Nippon Konpo 
hopes to capitalize on trade between Japan and the developing 
industrial belt along the Yangzi River.  In addition, Nippon Konpo 
plans to establish a transportation network in China by setting up 
representative offices in Shanghai, Chongqing, and Guangzhou. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 14 Feb 94 p 11) 

   Nippo Ltd., an Osaka-based trading company with strong ties to 
printing companies, will open a wholly owned subsidiary offset 
printing plant in Beijing.  The subsidiary, Beijing Nippo Printing 
Co. Ltd., will be capitalized at $2.3 million.  The plant, which 
will begin operations in late March, will import all materials from 
Japan and will print high-quality four-color artwork for Japanese 
companies operating in China.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 22 Feb 94 p 10) 

   Consulting Services - Cosmo Public Relation, a marketing 
consulting company, has established a JV marketing consulting 
company, Cosmo China Enterprise Ltd., to provide support to Japanese 
companies planning to enter the Hong Kong and PRC markets.  The JV 
will be capitalized at HK$200,000 ($26,000).  The Chinese partner 
will be a company owned by Yang Zhenhan, a former high-level Chinese 
Government official with experience in the machine and auto- 
manufacturing industries, and Tan Nushi, a former Shanghai official 
responsible for textiles.  The JV firm will use the "personal 
contacts" and market knowledge of Yang and Tan to provide 
introductions to government organizations and business partners, and 
to provide business-site selection and real estate contract 
mediation services.  The JV will have its head office in Hong Kong 
and a a branch office in Shanghai.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 8 
Feb 94 p 6) 

   Ikeda Hiroyoshi Accountants, an accounting firm, and Inform, an 
Osaka-based consulting company specializing in investment in China, 
together with the Shanghai Yangzi International Economic Cooperation 
Center, will establish a consulting company in Shanghai to target 
small Japanese companies that are interested in setting up 
operations in China.  The new company, Shanghai Foreign Business 
Commercial Research Club, will advise small companies on the legal, 
accounting, and tax systems in China and sponsor regular seminars on 
business and personnel management, taxes, and legal issues in China. 
The club will not be based on capital investment but will "operate 
cooperatively," supported entirely by membership fees of 50,000 yen 
($476) and monthly dues of 20,000 yen ($190).  The club hopes to 
recruit 50 companies.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 21 Feb 94 p 15) 
PHILIPPINES:  Shipping Firm Establishes Subsidiary in Manila -- 
Keihin Co., a medium-sized warehousing and transport firm, has 
established a Philippine subsidiary, Keihin Everett Forwarding Co., 
headquartered in Manila.  As Japanese companies have expanded 
operations in the Philippines, the need for shipping services has 
grown.  Although Keihin has been handling product distribution and 
delivery services for Japanese companies there, establishing a 
subsidiary will allow it to initiate full-scale shipping services in 
the Philippines and expand its international transportation network. 
Initial annual sales for the subsidiary are expected to be 112 
million yen ($1.06 million).  Keihin already has subsidiaries in the 
United States, Singapore, Europe, and Hong Kong and resident offices 
in Taiwan and Australia.  (Tokyo NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN 24 Feb 94 p 
17) 

   THAILAND:  Canon To Expand Office Automation Equipment Production 
-- Canon Hi-Tech (Thailand) Ltd., a Canon subsidiary that produces 
office automation equipment such as copiers for the Japanese, 
European, and U.S. markets, will expand operations this year and 
increase production capacity by 30 percent.  In the past, when a new 
Canon product was manufactured in Thailand, the product was made 
entirely from parts imported from Japan.  As production increased, 
the local parts content gradually increased as well.  In the future, 
however, Canon Hi-Tech's planned expansion will permit the shift of 
parts production.  Thus, Canon Hi-Tech will be able to develop and 
produce new products from scratch, with the majority of parts 
manufactured in Thailand.  To ensure the continued high-quality of 
parts used in its products, in 1994 Canon Hi-Tech will bring in a 
technology team from Japan to handle product development. 

   Canon Hi-Tech was established in 1990 in Bangkok to help Canon 
offset the effects of yen appreciation.  In 1993 the company shipped 
260,000 copiers and 430,000 printers, with sales totaling 20 billion 
yen ($190.5 million).  The expansion work will begin in March and 
should be completed by October 1994.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
15 Feb 94 p 13) 

   UNITED STATES:  Kobe Steel, TI To Market Cladding Material in 
Japan -- Kobe Steel and Texas Instruments (TI) have agreed to 
jointly market cold-rolled cladding material in Japan manufactured 
in the United States by TI.  This will be the first introduction of 
cold-rolled cladding material on the Japanese market.  TI, which 
developed its own technology to produce cold-rolled cladding 
material that is two to three times stronger than existing 
materials, decided to link up with Kobe Steel in entering the Japan 
market because Kobe has the aluminum and steel resources and also 
has "deep connections" with its consumers.  The companies have 
already decided on one use of the cladding material--to make the 
stainless aluminum composite used in the canisters of induction- 
heating (IH) thermoses and in the pots for IH rice cookers. 
Kobe Steel and TI have set a FY94 sales target of 300 tons of 
cladding material and a turnover of 500 million yen ($4.8 million). 
Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. also unofficially plans to use 
this cladding material in its new IH thermos.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 16 Feb 94 p 17) 

   Sumitomo Metal To Extend Technical Cooperation to Steel Rod Firm 
- Sumitomo Metal Industries will cooperate technically with American 
Steel and Wire (AS and W), a steel rod manufacturer based in Ohio. 
Sumitomo Metal will provide software-related support to AS and W in 
equipping its new high-grade steel bar mill, will help conduct 
various technical inspections, and also will provide operational 
support when the mill opens.  U.S. steelmakers are considering 
whether to file dumping charges against Japanese firms as a measure 
to shut out imports of high-grade steel.  AS and W decided to seek 
technical support from Sumitomo Metal, with which it has previous 
business ties in purchasing steel rods.  Sumitomo Metal, on the 
other hand, is seeking to establish a foothold in the U.S. market. 

   The new AS and W mill, which will cost an estimated $70 million 
and will have a production capacity of 550,000 tons annually, will 
produce high-grade steel bars 30-40 millimeters in size mainly for 
use in automobiles.  Plant construction is scheduled to begin this 
summer, with completion targeted for December 1995.  Sumitomo 
Metal's two-year cooperation agreement, which began in February 
1994, includes a financial commitment of- 100 million yen 
($962,000). 

   Sumitomo Metal may consider expanding its cooperation with AS and 
W to include technical support for remodeling AS and W's existing 
wire rod mill and building facilities to manufacture billets.  It 
will then follow up with consultations with AS and W on producing 
high-grade auto parts.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 22 Feb 94 p 15) 

   VIETNAM:  Japanese Firm To Assist Marine Products Processing 
Company -- Shinto Bussan, the importing subsidiary of Toyo Suisan, a 
major Japanese food products company, will expand the technical 
guidance it provides to the Vietnamese company that processes the 
marine products Shin to Bussan imports into Japan.  By raising the 
processing level of products like shrimp and squid, Shinto Bussan 
can sell them directly to Japanese sushi and specialty restaurants 
and other retailers and make far higher profits.  In this way, 
Shin to Bussan hopes to increase sales of products imported from 
Vietnam to 1.5 billion yen ($14.3 million) annually from the current 
1 billion yen ($9.5 million) level. 

   Shinto Bussan will expand the technical guidance it provides to 
its production consignee, SeaProdex, a Vietnamese state-operated 
enterprise that processes more than 30 marine products for Shin to 
Bussan at eight processing plants.  Shinto Bussan's imports from 
Vietnam constitute 20 percent of the company's total sales.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 Feb 94 p 17) 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - MT Sales Fell 25 Percent in 1993, 
December Sales Dropped 16 Percent -- According to statistics 
compiled by the Japan Machine Tool Builders' Association, machine 
tool (MT) sales for 1993 totaled 531.783 billion yen ($5.06 
billion), down 25.1 percent compared to 1992.  Sales of lathes and 
machining centers dropped by 45 percent.  Total domestic sales for 
the year came to 322.57 billion yen ($3.07 billion), down 32.0 
percent, while exports totaled 209.213 billion yen ($1.99 billion), 
down 11.2 percent.  The large decline in domestic sales raised the 
ratio of exports to total sales to 39.3 percent, topping the 
previous high of 36 percent recorded in 1986.  Outstanding orders 
fell to 267 billion yen ($2.54 billion) at the end of 1993 compared 
to 354.9 billion yen ($3.38 billion) in 1992. 

   For December, MT sales totaled 40.054 billion yen ($381.467 
million), down 16.7 percent compared to December 1992.  However, 
this is the first time in three months that monthly sales have risen 
above the 40 billion yen ($381 million) level.  December domestic 
sales came to 23.068 billion yen ($220 million), down 24.0 percent 
year-on-year but up 10.3 percent from November.  December exports 
were 16.986 billion yen ($161.8 million), down 4.3 percent from 
December 1992.  However, exports to the United States increased. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 10 Feb 94 p 11) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC Wins Supercomputer 
Order From Private University -- NEC Corp. has won an contract from 
Fukuoka University, a private institution in Fukuoka City, to build 
a  research and education system" that includes a supercomputer at a 
total cost of just over 1 billion yen ($9.3 million).  The company 
will provide its "SX-3/IIR" vector supercomputer.  Further, NEC will 
construct a local-area network (LAN) that will combine image 
processing workstations, education-use personal computers, and a 
library information system.  One "special feature" of the system is 
that the supercomputer and workstations will use UNIX operating 
software.  The system will be delivered in August and is expected to 
be in operation by October. 

   This is NEC's first supercomputer order in the Kyushu region. 
Also, NEC's supercomputer will replace a Fujitsu-made "VP2100/10" 
the university has been using. 

   NEC has not won any of the bids for ten of the eleven 
supercomputers funded under the the government's first FY93 
supplemental budget, while Fujitsu has won four.  In several of the 
bids, including those sponsored by the Communications Research 
Laboratory and Tsukuba University, the two firms competed head on, 
but Fujitsu won out over NEC and the other bidders with lower prices 
and higher technical evaluations "beyond the scope of expectations." 
With the Fukuoka University contract, however, NEC "has had its 
revenge."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 4 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Seiko Epson To Build IC Design-In Center in China - Seiko Epson 
Corp. will establish an integrated circuit (IC) design-in center in 
Shenzhen, China in the spring of 1995.  The center's goal will be to 
strengthen local customer support for Seiko Epson's IC design-in 
operations in China, which were developed through Hong Kong. 
Currently most of Seiko Epson's design-in customers are in Japan, 
but the company has decided "it is essential to increase foreign 
sales."  Therefore it is expanding directly into China, where the 
company anticipates a huge demand in the future for design-in ICs. 
Seiko Epson first will focus on developing a market in southern 
China for semiconductors designed for use in light industry, such as 
electronic notebooks and game machines. 

   Seiko Epson derives about 50 percent of its sales from customized 
and semi-customized ICs.  In this field the ability to develop 
products which are specialized to a user's needs is the deciding 
factor in a company's success.  For this reason, after starting its 
semiconductor operations in 1980, Seiko Epson moved to aggressively 
strengthen its design-in system. 

   Domestically, Seiko Epson has semiconductor design-in centers in 
Tokyo, Osaka, Nagoya, Fujimi, and Sapporo.  The Shenzhen center will 
be Seiko Epson's fourth overseas design-in center; the other three 
are in Canada, California, and Taiwan.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
10 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - NEC, Mitsui To Build Ground 
Station For Sri Lanka Telecom -- NEC and Mitsui and Co. have won a 
contract worth 1.5 billion yen ($14.4 million) from Sri Lanka 
Telecom, the country's state-run telecommunications enterprise, to 
build an INTELSAT (International Telecommunication Satellite 
Organization) Standard-A ground station and supply NEAX61 switching 
equipment.  The ground station, the second in Sri Lanka, will be 
built in the eastern outskirts of Colombo, Sri Lanka's capital, by 
early 1995.  It will increase the country's international 
communications capacity from the existing 500 lines to 2,500. 
Sri Lanka Telecom will set up support facilities in the Padukka 
region, east of Bombay, India, and plans to begin operations at the 
ground station in early 1995.  All financing for the project will be 
handled through the Asia Development Bank.  AT and T and Sweden's 
Ericsson also bid for the project, but Sri Lanka Telecom selected 
NEC and Mitsui based on its "high appraisal" of the first ground 
station the two companies built in 1975. 

   Demand for international communications in Sri Lanka is growing 
not only because the country is a popular tourist spot, but more 
importantly because several Asian countries, especially South Korea, 
have begun textile production operations there.  NEC is seeking to 
sell its equipment for both international and domestic 
communications in conjunction with Sri Lanka's active program to 
upgrade its communications infrastructure.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 22 Feb 94 p 7) 

   NHK Will Lease Circuit on Panamsat Satellite - The Japan 
Broadcasting Corp. (NHK) has confirmed that it will lease a circuit 
on the Panamsat (Pan American) satellite, scheduled to be placed in 
orbit this May, for video transmission of its newscasts between 
Japan and the United States.  NHK, which currently leases two 
circuits from INTELSAT (International Telecommunications Satellite 
Organization), reached its decision after "a comprehensive review of 
factors."  Reportedly the deciding factor was Panamsat's low costs, 
although NHK has not made a "definite statement" regarding this 
matter.  NKH and Panamsat are currently working out final details of 
the contract through Kokusai Denshin Denwa (KDD), which is acting as 
the negotiating agent between the two firms because Panamsat does 
not have an office in Japan--a requirement for foreign enterprises 
seeking satellite communications business activities with Japan, as 
stipulated in the Japanese Government's deregulation measures for 
this sector of the communications industry. 

   NHK's decision to contract with Panamsat will likely encourage 
other Japanese customers to follow.  This trend will affect 
INTELSAT, which currently dominates the Japan-U.S. video 
transmission market, but will also affect Japanese companies like 
Japan Satellite Systems, which is seeking to establish a presence in 
the international satellite communications market.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 18 Feb 94 p 6) 

   Tokyo Experimental CATV Project To Be Operational by 1996 - The 
Tokyo Metropolitan Government soon will begin planning for a large 
experimental digital-based cable television (CATV) project in the 
new city center currently under development in the Tokyo Bay area. 
The CATV project is slated to be operational in 1996.  This May the 
metropolitan government will call on representatives from the public 
and private sector, including the Ministry of Posts and 
Telecommunications, the Japan Broadcasting Corp. (NHK), Nippon 
Telegraph and Telephone (NTT), NEC, Hitachi, Matsushita Electric 
Industrial Co., and communications software companies to form a 
committee and define a project plan.  The government estimates it 
will cost about 3 billion yen ($28.8 million) to build the CATV 
project center and to develop the necessary software. 

   Once the committee defines an overall plan, the metropolitan 
government will proceed with building the project center and 
establishing a 100-channel CATV network for offices and residences 
in the city center area that also will provide services such as 
video-on-demand, home television shopping, interactive health and 
medical consulting, and business communications services.  The 
metropolitan government plans to officially inaugurate the CATV 
project in March 1996 during the "Tokyo Frontier" world trade fair. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 26 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., EO Revamp Production 
Agreement - Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. has concluded an OEM 
(original equipment manufacturer) agreement with EO, a California- 
based company which develops portable communications terminal units. 
The move follows a request by EO to discontinue its existing 
consignment production relationship with Matsushita because the 
number of units currently produced is considerably lower than 
originally forecast due to a decline in demand in the U.S. market. 

   America Matsushita Computer, based in Illinois, has been 
producing EO terminal units on consignment since 1992, when EO was 
established with investment from Matsushita Electric Industrial, AT 
and T, and Olivetti.  Initially, the two companies set production 
targets of 5,000 units per month, but because of the decline in U.S. 
market demand, they realized only half the target figure. 
Matsushita states "it is not thinking about reexamining the other 
aspects of its EO relationship, such as withdrawing its investment 
from the company."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Feb 94 p 12) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Shanghai Enterprise Ownership 
Composition Changes Through Reform -- Economic reform has had a 
tremendous impact on enterprise ownership composition in Shanghai, 
with the number of joint ventures, private enterprises, and other 
types of ownerships growing yearly.  According to the latest 
statistics, from 1980 to early 1993, state-owned enterprises 
declined from 85.9 percent to 62.2 percent of Shanghai's gross 
domestic product while collectives, private, and joint venture 
enterprises grew from 12.4 percent, 0.3 percent, and 1.7 percent to 
19.2 percent, 2 percent, and 18.2 percent of the gross domestic 
product respectively. 

   Shanghai has vigorously encouraged the development of collective 
enterprises in townships since 1985.  The ensuing policy of opening 
up has also helped to attract a lot of foreign investment.  With the 
liberalization of enterprise ownership, Shanghai's private 
enterprises have grown to over 5,000 at present.  After the 
socialist market economy was instituted in 1992, the shareholding 
system proliferated.  There are now over 90 Shanghai enterprises 
selling shares to the public, with capital exceeding 23 billion 
yuan.  The growing economic prosperity during the past 15 years 
proves that ownership reform is suited to China's general economic 
development.  This reform is not only beneficial to raising people's 
living standard, increasing state revenue, and maintaining social 
stability, it is also beneficial to establishing a socialist market 
economy.  (Shanghai WEN HUI BAO 8 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Textile Shortages, Price Increases Forecast in 1994 - According 
to estimates of the State Administration of Commodity Prices, this 
year textile supplies will not meet demand and prices will rise. 
Based on an annual output of 1,150,000 tons of cotton yarn, the 
textile industry needs 3.5 million tons of cotton, but cotton 
shortages will reach 1 million tons.  Because cotton prices have 
increased, the price of cotton yarn has also increased.  In 
December, 21-count yarn was 14,000 yuan per ton, and 32-count yarn 
was 15,000 yuan per ton, increases of 28 percent and 17 percent 
respectively over the first quarter of 1993.  This year the price of 
cotton yarn will continue to rise. 

   China produces about 2 million tons of chemical fiber annually, 
and imports 650,000 tons.  In 1994, the price of chemical fiber will 
increase.  Annual domestic output of polyester is 1.1 million tons 
while the processing industry needs 1.3 million tons.  Annual 
imports are 200,000 tons.  In December, the price was 10,3000 yuan 
per ton and in 1994 the price will remain at the current level. 
Annual output of dacron is 700,000 tons, and the processing industry 
needs 800,000 tons.  Annual imports are 150,000 tons.  However, in 
1993 the international market price increased and imports decreased. 
In December, the price was 12,5000 yuan per ton.  Production 
enterprises that use this material changed or stopped production. 
In 1994 dacron prices will rise.  Meanwhile, annual domestic output 
of acrylic fibers is 150,000 to 200,000 tons and the processing 
industry needs 400,000 tons.  Thus, imports supply over SO percent. 
In 1994 the price will follow the international market.  (Shanghai 
SHANGHAI JINGJI BAO 28 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Bank of China To Introduce Computerized Service Network - By 
January this year, renminbi deposits in the Bank of China had 
increased by almost 4 billion yuan over the end of last year, to 
stand at 112 billion yuan.  By the end of last year, foreign 
currency deposits in the bank amounted to $9.19 billion, an increase 
of more than 50 percent over the end of the previous year.  In this 
year's work, the bank will focus on improving efficiency, providing 
better service, increasing flexibility, strengthening the formation 
of the deposit network, perfecting the disposition of the network, 
improving the service functions of big cities' deposit networks, and 
expediting the automation of deposit service, the aim being to 
"invigorate itself by means of science and technology."  This year 
it has planned to equip a large number of service networks in all 
branches with computers.  It will try to greatly increase the 
popularity and use rate of its computerized network in the shortest 
possible time.  It will actively and appropriately introduce a 
single-person receipt and payment operational method to its deposit 
service.  This method will be introduced by trial throughout the 
country and popularized in coastal areas.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 1318 GMT 16 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Shenzhen Calls Halt to Listing of New 'A' Share Issues - The 
Shenzhen stock exchange has imposed a complete halt on new listings 
of "A" shares, issued to locals, in an apparent attempt to ease 
strains put on the system by the rush of companies coming to the 
market.  Although the 22 February official statement said the ban 
applied to all issues, it is unlikely that "B" shares, which are 
traded by foreign investors, will be affected.  Saying that 
investors were unhappy with the flood of new shares being listed, 
the exchange indicated that listings would resume depending on 
market conditions. 

   Analysts said the problem lay with the government's overly 
ambitious plan to enlarge stock markets, while ignoring the markets' 
capacity to absorb new shares.  Of the 5 billion shares approved for 
listing in 1993, only about 2.6 billion had been listed by the end 
of the year, leaving 2.4 billion to be listed in 1994, thereby 
straining the listing schedule.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MOENING POST 
(BUSINESS POST) 23 Feb 94 p 1) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Shandong Remains Country's Leading Gold Producer - Shandong 
Province overfulfilled its annual gold production target last year, 
thereby retaining its 18-year lock on the position of China's 
leading gold producer.  Shandong's gold reserves amount to half the 
PRC's total, with annual production accounting for one-third of 
national output.  With the deepening of reform and the strengthening 
of administration over the industry, as well as enterprises' 
implementation of 14 self-decision-making powers, 1993 profits in 
the industry rose by 30 percent over the previous year.  Since last 
year, the gold industry has adjusted its development strategy by 
investing in other industries.  By the end of 1993, RMB2OO million 
had been invested in such industries as construction materials, 
electronics, and metallurgy, with profits tax earned in these 
industries alone amounting to 40 million yuan.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 1356 GMT 16 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Xiamen To Invest in Transport Facilities - Pan Shijian, general 
manager of the Xiamen Municipal Roads and Bridges Construction 
Investment Corporation, said that 1994 would see the largest amount 
of investment and the greatest number of projects to construct 
transport facilities in the special economic zone.  Pan said Xiamen 
would adopt various measures to raise capital by guaranteeing the 
commencement of all key items.  Construction began last year on the 
Shigushan overpass, at a total cost of 90 million yuan.  The project 
is scheduled for completion by September 1994.  Work has begun on 
reconstruction of the Jimei-Guankou road, also slated for completion 
by September, while the 19-km Jimei-Tongan road will be upgraded at 
a total cost of 400 million yuan.  The work will be completed in 
1995.  In March, construction will begin on the Xiaoyingling section 
of the Fuzhou-Xiamen expressway.  It should be completed within four 
years.  Construction of the Haicang bridge will start by the end of 
1994, with planned investment of RMB2 billion, to be raised in 
several ways, including government allocation and the issue of 
stocks both at home and abroad.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0815 
GMT 25 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau) 

   Jialing To List Subsidiaries in Hong Kong - Jialing, a Hong Kong- 
based company controlled by Sichuan Province, is restructuring its 
subsidiaries in an effort to list them on the Hong Kong Stock 
Exchange.  Recently, Jialing has operated as a holding company and 
has filed an application with the mainland authorities to gain 
commensurate status there.  Jialing's businesses cover import- 
export, equity investments in industrial and commercial enterprises, 
real estate investments, information services, securities, 
transportation, hotels, and the importation of capital and 
technology.  Last year, 70 percent of its income came from real 
estate investments, mostly in Hong Kong.  According to Jialing's 
chairman, Liu Guangbing, the company will increase investment in the 
mainland this year.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 23 Feb 94 p C3) Hong Kong 
Bureau 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Fujian Sets Up Intellectual 
Property Rights Court -- Fujian provincial's procuratorial court has 
set up an intellectual property rights (IPR) judicial court recently 
and the City of Xiamen's Intermediate People's Court has also 
officially set up an IPR protection court.  The move is to 
demonstrate that the province will fully exercise its judicial 
authority in IPR cases and is determined to punish the infringement 
and violation of IPR.  According to an estimate, the various levels 
of the people's court in Fujian has in recent years handled 47 cases 
and tried 35 involving IPR.  These cases include disputes about 
authorship (copyright) rights, patent rights, and trademark rights. 
Some cases involve foreign enterprise contract disputes.  For 
example, one such case was between a certain company in Hong Kong 
and a certain unit in Fujian in dispute involving non-patent 
technology transfer and in patent application permits. 

   The cases being tried in the provincial procuratorial court cover 
seven categories of disputes:  patent disputes; trademark disputes; 
copyright disputes; disputes involving invention infringement, 
exclusive rights to technology and other scientific and 
technological achievements; technology contractual disputes; 
disputes involving illegal competition; and any other disputes 
belonging to the scope of intellectual property protection rights. 
All categories apply to sino-foreign, Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan 
cases.  (Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO 2 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Shanghai Exports Exceed Target in 1993 - Shanghai's exports 
exceeded $7.38 billion in 1993 and the export growth rate was higher 
than the national average.  In early 1993, the Shanghai municipal 
government set its export target at $7.34 billion, but by mid-year 
only 45 percent of the target had been fulfilled.  In June, a 
municipal economic and trade conference was held to further reform 
and to create an environment more compatible with a socialist market 
economy.  After administrative protection and preferential policies 
were abolished, foreign trade enterprises were forced into market 
competition.  Last year, foreign trade privileges were also granted 
to an additional 4,000 or so industrial units, research institutes, 
enterprises, and joint venture firms, bringing Shanghai's trading 
entities to approximately 7,000.  Meanwhile, all relevant government 
work units were instructed to support exports and to launch 
coordinated measures.  After concerted efforts, exports began to 
increase and eventually exceeded the 1993 target. 

   Future export growth is targeted at 15.4 percent annually.  Since 
the state abandoned the mandatory export plan and foreign exchange 
submitting quota, relevant export promoting measures, including 
transforming the operational mechanism of trade offices, providing 
incentives, and adjusting industrial production, should be 
instituted as soon as possible.  (Shanghai WEN HUI BAO 6 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Guangzhou To Set Up Individual Foreign Exchange Markets - Plans 
are in the making for Guangdong's capital city to set up individual 
swap centers to handle foreign exchange transactions. These 
individual centers will then link up with the nationally established 
foreign exchange centers. 

   Presently, Guangzhou's foreign exchange regulating markets have 
two kinds of operations.  One involves a specified volume and the 
other a spot exchange.  Having planned to expedite a nationwide 
foreign exchange market network, the Bank of China and the State 
Administration of Exchange Control are setting up the corresponding 
financial organs at the provincial and city levels.  Under the plan, 
the Guangzhou area is the first to form public swap centers, then 
set up a province wide network, and lastly, to link up with the 
national foreign exchange market network.  Additionally, Guangzhou 
will set up the Guangzhou financial center and a city shareholding 
cooperative bank to handle the Renminbi operations involving 
promissary notes and financial capital.  (Beijing ZHONGHUA DISAN 
CHANYE BAO 6 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Foreign Investment Estimated at $30 Billion for 1993 - China 
became the world's biggest foreign investment recipient country in 
1993.  Actual foreign investment introduced for the whole year 
exceeded $30 billion, of which Guangdong Province accounted for one- 
quarter, ranking first among China's provinces and municipalities. 
According to statistics, foreign businessmen invested in nearly 
100,000 projects in mainland China in 1993.  Agreements signed 
involved $110 billion, of which direct investment exceeded $20 
billion. 

   Guangdong Province attracted more foreign investment than any 
other province.  Last year, $8.5 billion was actually received, 
accounting for one-quarter of total foreign investment in the 
mainland.  Shanghai ranked second in 1993 with $7.016 billion. 
Beijing ranked third, attracting $6.28 billion.  These were followed 
by Shenzhen, which attracted more than $5 billion; Fujian, $2.8 
billion; Jiangsu, $2.1 billion; Shandong, $1.6 billion; Guangxi, 
$1.06 billion, and Hainan, $730 million.  The overall amount of 
foreign investment in China increased by a wide margin over the 
previous year. 

   Hong Kong businessmen ranked first in investing on the mainland 
last year, with investments exceeding about $13 billion.  Taiwan 
businessmen ranked second, with investments amounting to more than 
$6 billion, exceeding the total of many previous years.  U.S., 
Japanese, and German businessmen also made enormous amounts of 
investment in the mainland last year.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN 
SHE 0928 GMT 18 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Guangdong Foreign-Funded Enterprises Expand Export Share - 
According to an office of the Guangdong Provincial Government, by 
late 1993, foreign-funded enterprises in Guangdong and local state- 
owned foreign trade, industrial, and commercial enterprises had 
almost equal shares of the export business for the first time. 
Guangdong's 1993 export volume hit $26.33 billion, of which $10 
billion was contributed by foreign-funded enterprises.  In 1993, the 
average export growth rate throughout the province was 8.6 percent, 
while the corresponding growth rate of foreign-funded enterprises 
was as high as 23.2 percent.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0947 
GMT 17 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Beijing Views Use of Foreign Loans, Donations - Since 1979, 
Beijing has applied multilateral aid totaling $29.903 million from 
the UN Planning Program for carrying out 33 projects; and aid 
totalling $86.63 million yuan from Japan, Australia, Canada, 
Germany, and other countries for carrying out 15 projects.  Nineteen 
aid projects, involving $62 million, were being carried out in 1993. 
As of the end of 1993, Beijing had used government loans and 
donations from 14 countries for carrying out 85 projects, involving 
$820 million.  With these loans, Beijing has completed 54 projects 
involving $137.52 million and carried out 19 projects involving 
$611.38 million.  Agreements were also reached on the use of loans 
for building six projects, involving $28.72 million.  Beijing has 
also used foreign donations to complete four projects, involving 
$11.75 million.  These foreign loans and donations were mainly used 
for building infrastructure and industries related to the people's 
lives in the capital, covering industry, agriculture, foodstuffs, 
aquaculture, environmental protection, education, scientific 
research, fire prevention, and communications management.  For 
example, Japan has provided 2.7 billion yen of free aid for building 
the China meat products research center to take charge of Beijing's 
meat quality inspection, and the Japanese Government has provided 
aid of 3 billion yen for China to build Beijing Television Station 
and granted 19.2 billion yen in loans to help Beijing build a 
subway.  (Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 13 Feb 94 p 1) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Hebei Use of 1993 Foreign Loans - Hebei Province has achieved a 
breakthrough in the use of foreign loans.   As of the end of 1993, 
the Hebei Province had carried out 161 projects with foreign loans, 
involving foreign capital of $670 million, and with $580 million of 
funds actually utilized.  These loans were mainly used for improving 
saline-alkaline farmlands, developing farming on Huang-Huai-Hai 
Plain, and building fast-growing forestry; improving teaching 
conditions, training teachers and developing adult education; 
preventing and curing tuberculosis; building the Hebei section of 
Beijing-Tianjin-Tanggu expressway, the No.7 and No.8 berths of 
Tangshan Port, Shijiazhuang-Tangshan microwave telecommunications 
line, and 240,000 program-controlled telephone lines in seven 
central cities and 22 counties and cities; carrying out polluted 
water disposal and gas supply projects in Handan, Shijiazhuang, and 
Baoding cities; and building a cement kiln with a daily production 
capacity of 2,000 tons at the Tangshan Qixin Cement Plant. 
(Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO 8 Feb 94 p 1) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Airbus Signs Spare Parts Production Deal - On 1 March, Airbus 
Industrie announced that it had signed a major cooperation agreement 
in Beijing last month with the China Aviation Supplies Corporation 
which will allow Chinese manufacturers to become further involved in 
the production of the company's spare parts.  The deal is valued in 
the hundreds of millions of dollars.  Airbus will deliver nine 
aircraft to Chinese companies this year and has announced plans to 
set up a training center and a service support center in Beijing. 
About 40 percent of pilots and other workers who receive training at 
the Airbus headquarters in France are expected to come from China. 
Airbus also has set up Airbus Industrie China, which handles 
commercial, industrial, and product support activity in the PRC. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY 2 Mar 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Aerospace Industry Corporation Seeks International Cooperation - 
An official from the China Aerospace Industry Corporation has said 
that the corporation seeks more extensive international cooperation 
in the areas of satellite information systems, mobile communication 
devices, global television relay systems, and satellite data 
communication VSAT stations.  He also said that the corporation 
plans to expand the scale of cooperation in other areas, such as the 
manufacture of communications, resource-survey, meteorological, and 
navigational satellites, as well as various kinds of satellites for 
scientific experiments, and that satellite launching services also 
will be provided.  At a news conference last June, the corporation 
announced 93 cooperation projects involving $1.28 billion.  A 
majority of the state laboratories and applied technology research 
centers under the corporation have been opened up to the outside 
world.  (Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO, No 8, 28 Feb 94) Hong Kong 
Bureau 

   Stanley Ho Threatens To Halt Mainland Investments - Property 
developer and Macao casino operator Stanley Ho has threatened to 
stop investing in the Chinese real estate market if the capital 
gains tax on property is implemented.  Ho issued the warning at a 
foundation-laying ceremony in Shanghai on 26 February for his 
Shanghai Plaza development, an office, residential, and hotel 
complex.  Shun Tak Holdings, which is controlled by Ho, has a 15- 
percent stake, and one of his private companies has 20 percent of 
the 8-billion-yuan project.  "If the tax is implemented, I will not 
be interested in further investment," Ho said, referring to 
Beijing's new value-added land tax, but he added that his existing 
projects on the mainland would proceed as scheduled.  (Hong Kong 
EASTERN EXPRESS 28 Feb 94 p 31) Hong Kong Bureau 

   China Overseas To Invest in Guangdong Power Plant - The Hong 
Kong-listed China Overseas Development Company Limited, a wholly 
owned subsidiary of China State Construction Engineering 
Corporation, is planning to invest $117 million in a thermal power 
plant project in Shaoguan City, Guangdong Province.  The plant, 
Shaoguan City Pingshi Power Plant (B Factory), is a joint venture 
with the Shaoguan City government and the Shui Heng Development 
Company Limited, who hold 25 percent and 22.5 percent respectively. 
The joint venture has a 20-year operating franchise for the plant. 
(Hong Kong HSIN PAO 1 Mar 94 p 5) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Hong Kong Firm Holds Two Thirds Shares of Guangdong Power Plant - 
Hong Kong-based Chia Ho Ltd. has invested in a power plant in 
Guangdong under Maoming City's Electric Development Corporation and 
now holds two thirds of the shares at a cost of HK$23 million.  The 
term of the partnership is 35 years.  This four-year-old power plant 
has eight generating units imported from Germany, with an installed 
capacity of over 50,000 kw.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 24 Feb 94 p 5) 
Hong Kong Bureau 

   Xiamen People's Income, Foreign Capital Increase - Last year, 
Xiamen's per-capita gross domestic product amounted to 9,288 yuan, 
about 10 times the amount before the establishment of the Xiamen 
special economic zone.  Citizens' per-capita annual income was 2,034 
yuan, an increase of 24.8 percent over the previous year, while 
peasants' per-capita annual net income was 1,690 yuan, an increase 
of 20.2 percent over the previous year.  Meanwhile, Xiamen has 
improved its approval procedures and management in introducing 
foreign capital.  The city approved 655 foreign-invested projects 
last year.  Contracted foreign capital was $2.404 billion, while 
foreign capital that actually arrived in Xiamen amounted to $1.034 
billion, an increase of 84.8 percent over the previous year.  There 
were 391 newly started foreign-invested enterprises last year, an 
increase of 167.81 percent over the previous year.  (Fuzhou Fujian 
People's Radio Network 2300 GMT 16, 17 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau) 

   Zhuhai, Singapore Company Sign Shipyard Construction Pact - 
Zhuhai Port Investment, a subsidiary of the Port Authority of 
Zhuhai, signed a joint-venture contract on 1 March with Singapore's 
Marinteknik company to build a 5-hectare shipyard for the production 
and maintenance of catamarans and monohull ferries, China's first 
such shipyard.  Marinteknik's investment will amount to $12 million. 
The two partners have a long history of cooperation, having linked 
up in 1982 to provide the first passenger ferry service between Hong 
Kong and Zhuhai.  Phase one of the shipyard will be completed in 
mid-1995, enabling the yard to produce 12-16 high-speed ferries per 
year, which will generate revenues of some $50 million.  In 
addition, the yard will provide ferry maintenance services, which 
initially should earn around $5 million.  Phase two is slated for 
completion in early 1997.  Marinteknik will hold a 60-percent stake 
in the 50-year joint venture, which initially will be aimed at the 
export market, though the longer-term outlook envisions selling up 
to 50 percent of output in China.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 2 Mar 
94 p 23) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Sino-Thai Project To Produce Suzuki Motorbikes in Nanning - The 
Nanning machinery factory and the Thailand S.P. International 
Company have pooled funds to establish the Nanning Yibin Motorcycle 
Company Limited, which will produce "Suzuki King" motorcycles in 
Nanning.  The new company has an investment of $29.55 million, of 
which the Chinese side contributed 40 percent.  A contract has been 
signed with Japan's Suzuki Company to import advanced technology, 
facilities, and management methods to produce Suzuki GS125ESK 
motorcycles and other new models.  By 1996, the company will have an 
annual output of 400,000 motorcycles.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
26 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Wuhan Iron and Steel Imports Spanish Machinery - On 1 March, 
China's fourth largest steel producer, the Wuhan Iron and Steel 
Corporation (WISC), signed a contract with two Spanish companies- 
-Tecnicas Reunidas Internacional SA and Eurocontrol SA--to import an 
$82.1 million continuous casting machine intended for the second 
stage of WISC's No. 3 steel smelting plant.  The two Spanish 
companies earlier had supplied equipment worth $320 million for the 
plant's first stage.  WISC used both Spanish Government and 
commercial loans to seal the deals.  The No. 3 plant, with an annual 
steel production capacity of 2.5 million tons, will go into 
operation in 26 months, laying the foundation for WISC to increase 
its annual steel output to 10 million tons by the end of the 
century.  In 1993, WISC produced 5.06 million tons of steel and 5.44 
million tons of iron, increases of 6.12 and 6.69 percent, 
respectively, over the previous year.  Sales revenues for 1993 
amounted to 11.37 billion yuan ($1.3 billion), up 26 percent; taxes 
and profits hit 3.1 billion yuan ($356 million), up 38 percent; 
while exports hit $110 million, up 25 percent.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 
2 Mar 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Tianjin Establishes Joint-Venture Building Materials Institute - 
The Tianjin building materials supply general company and the 
Australian CSR company will jointly build a precast concrete 
project, and the Tianjin Municipal Building Materials Research 
Institute will cooperate with the Housing Construction Research 
Center of an Australian university to establish the Tianjin- 
Australian building materials research institute--the first of its 
kind in China.  The agreement signing ceremony was held at the 
conference room of the Tianjin Municipal government on 19 February. 
The investment of the concrete company totals $30 million and the 
designed annual production capacity is 1 million cubic meters of 
concrete.  Four production lines and 90 sets of concrete equipment 
will be set up in Dongli, Nankai, Hexi, and Hongqiao building 
materials supply companies under the Tianjin building materials 
supply general company.  This project is expected to be completed 
within this year.  Based on the agreement, the Tianjin Commission of 
Science and Technology will cooperate with a university in Australia 
in research, exchange of scholars, training of personnel, and 
exchange of academic data, and the Tianjin-Australia building 
research institute will serve as their cooperation demonstration 
unit in research regarding new building materials, quality control, 
and construction cost.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 19 Feb 94 p 1) Hong 
Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan:  Additional Incentives To Promote Southern Policy -- On 
14 February Minister of Economic Affairs Chiang Ping-kun said the 
ministry will offer additional incentives for Taiwanese businessmen 
to invest in Southeast Asia.  Chiang Ping-kun said such incentives 
would include extending workers' training period, urging banks to 
increase loans for companies which invest in Southeast Asia, and 
signing agreements with Southeast Asian countries to avoid double- 
taxation.  The ministry will also help secure loans to businessmen 
who are interested in establishing industrial development zones in 
the region.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 16 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Draft Trade Regulations on Hong Kong, Macao - The Executive 
Yuan's Mainland Affairs Council has drafted regulations concerning 
Taiwan-Hong Kong-Macao relations in investment, technological 
cooperation, shipping, finance, and insurance after Hong Kong and 
Macao are returned to the Chinese Communists in 1997 and 1999 
respectively.  The first internal examination of the 54-article 
draft regulations will be held on 24 February.  Parts of the draft 
regulations that concern the economy and trade include: Taiwanese 
businessmen must report their investment or technological 
cooperation in Hong Kong and Macao to the ministry; financial and 
insurance institutions must obtain prior approval before 
establishing branches in Hong Kong and Macao; the Ministry of 
Economic Affairs shall draw up procedures to regulate Hong Kong and 
Macao investments in Taiwan; and the Ministry of Transportation and 
Communications shall draw up procedures governing air and shipping 
services with Hong Kong and Macao.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 16 Feb 
94 p 3) Okinawa Bureau 

   Textile Companies To Invest or Expand in Vietnam - After the 
United States lifted its trade embargo against Vietnam, several 
Taiwanese textile companies decided to invest or expand their 
investments in Vietnam.  The Far East Textile Company plans to 
establish garment and dyeing mills in Vietnam soon.  At the end of 
1993, the Hualon Group applied to the Vietnamese Government to 
establish a comprehensive textile mill involving investment funds of 
$240 million.  The Huang Ti Lung Textile Company has decided to 
invest more than $20 million to establish knitting and spinning 
mills in Vietnam.  The Chung Hsing Textile Company, which has long 
been established in Vietnam, decided to invest another $50 million 
to expand its knitting and spinning production facilities in 
Vietnam.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 17 Feb 94 p 10) Okinawa Bureau 

   Government To Hold Current Tariffs on Automobiles, Parts for Now 
- In view of the fact that automobiles and the relevant industries 
account for 8.5 percent of Taiwan's total industrial output value, 
Vice Economic Minister Yang Shih-chien said on 17 February:  "The 
government will take this into account, and at this moment will not 
consider lowering tariffs on imported automobiles and parts and 
accessories before the issues of Taiwanese restrictions on car- 
exporting regions and of local car-parts content rates are settled 
during negotiations for GATT membership."  Although the United 
States calls for Taiwan to lower its auto tariff from 30 percent to 
15 percent, the government will still uphold the principle of 
lowering it slightly, with 25 percent as the bottom line.  (Taipei 
CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 18 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Imposition of Anti-Dumping Tax on Japanese, Korean Polypropylene 
- The Ministry of Finance has ruled that Japan and South Korea are 
dumping polypropylene (PP) in Taiwan, and decided to impose a 6.57- 
110.68 percent temporary anti-dumping tax on 18 South Korean and 
Japanese petroleum-chemical factories.  According to customs 
statistics, Taiwan imported 178,000 tonnes of PP in the first 11 
months of 1993, and nearly 60 percent of that was exported by Japan 
and South Korea.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 19 Feb 94 p 13) Okinawa 
Bureau 

   MOEA Assesses Impact on Manufacturers of Joining GATT - According 
to an assessment by the Ministry of Economic Affairs, after Taiwan 
joins GATT and lowers tariffs, the automobile and motorcycle, 
textile, and machine tool industries will experience the greatest 
impact.  It is estimated that the output value of the auto industry 
will drop by 60 percent, auto and motorcycle parts by 50 percent, 
and machine tools by 12.4 percent.  However, Taiwan's net exports 
and imports of manufactured goods may increase by $1.8 billion and 
$546 million respectively. The net output value of the manufacturing 
industry is likely to increase by $1.3 billion.  In addition to a 
decline in the output values of the aforementioned industries, 
thousands of workers in the auto and machinery industries may also 
lose their jobs after Taiwan joins GATT.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 
21 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Statistics on Exports to PRC May Be Underestimated - According to 
an official of the Board of Foreign Trade, Taiwan's real export 
value to the PRC is about 10-20 percent higher than statistics 
indicate.  The cause of this discrepancy is because Hong Kong did 
not add the price of PRC-bound transshipped or transit goods into 
their statistics.  It is also because some goods were not exported 
to the PRC via Hong Kong; therefore Hong Kong's statistics cannot 
represent Taiwan's total exports to the PRC.  According to PRC 
customs, Taiwan exported $12.9 billion of goods to the PRC and 
imported $1.4 billion of goods from the PRC in 1993.  PRC statistics 
on Taiwanese exports should be more reliable because they were based 
on certificates of origin.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 21 Feb 94 p 9) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  DPRK-Chosen Soren Joint Ventures Face 
Continuing Problems -- SUMMARY:  According to South Korean press 
reports, since 1990, most of the DPRK's joint venture companies with 
Chosen Soren (the General Association of Korean Residents in Japan) 
have failed because of contract violations, "excessive" government 
control, a shortage of electricity, and difficulties in obtaining 
technology from Japan.  The surviving companies are at "high risk" 
of closing down as well, if current conditions prevail, the reports 
say. 

   Since 1984, when joint venture laws were enacted in North Korea, 
Chosen Soren and the DPRK have established about 120 joint-venture 
companies which account for over 60 percent of the total number of 
DPRK joint ventures, according to the 13 January Seoul NAEWOE 
TONGSIN.  The 25 January Seoul HANGYORE SINMUN, citing the ROK 
National Unification Board's recent report to the National Assembly, 
states that since 1990, most of the North Korean joint ventures with 
Chosen Soren have closed down and only 20 some companies--out of 
more than 120--are currently in business.  Moreover, if the DPRK 
maintains its "excessive regulations" and "closed-door policy," the 
remaining joint ventures run the risk of going bankrupt as well, the 
paper asserts. 

   NAEWOE notes that, according to Chon Chin-sik, president of 
Moranbong Joint Venture Co. (one of the major DPRK-Chosen Soren 
joint-venture companies), as relations between Japan and the DPRK 
improved following former Deputy Prime Minister Shin Kanemaru's 
visit to Pyongyang in September 1990, North Korea moved from mainly 
dealing with Chosen Soren to attempting to "recruit" Japanese 
companies for joint venture projects.  Chon said that during this 
period, North Korea "ignored" Chosen Soren joint-venture companies. 

   Moreover, after the DPRK announced its withdrawal from the 
Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty in March 1993, it put "tight" 
restrictions on foreign visitors, including Koreans associated with 
Chosen Soren, and Japanese experts who were to advise the joint- 
venture factories on technical matters, NAEWOE reports.  In 
addition, the energy shortage in North Korea has had an impact on 
Chosen Soren joint ventures as well.  HANGYORE points out that North 
Korea has been giving preferential treatment to domestic companies 
which received their supply of electricity before Chosen Soren 
joint-venture companies.  Furthermore, North Korea has often 
exported substandard goods, causing a loss of credibility for the 
joint ventures and eliciting claims against them, according to 
HANGYORE.  For example, a large quantity of poorly made suits 
manufactured by Moranbong Joint Venture Co. was found at customs 
clearance in Japan last October, NAEWOE says. 

   NAEWOE cites additional reasons behind the difficulties 
experienced by the joint-venture companies, such as North Korea's 
violations of contract provisions,  excessive regulations," multiple 
inspections, and bribery.  North Korea has reportedly marketed goods 
in places that were not stipulated under existing agreements, such 
as Macao and Hong Kong, in order to obtain a better profit margin. 
NAEWOE reports that Chosen Soren "strongly protested" against such 
conduct in 1989 at the 4th annual meeting of Korea International 
Joint Venture Union Co.'s board of directors, which is responsible 
for coordinating and giving guidance to DPEK-Chosen Soren joint- 
venture projects.  The board's yearly meeting, whose purpose is to 
set guidelines for upcoming joint-venture activities, has not been 
held since November 1992, NAEWOE notes. 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Patent Office Looks for Countermeasures 
to Patent Disputes -- SUMMARY:  According to recent Seoul press 
reports, the number of ROK patent applications is growing, as is the 
number of patent disputes that ROK firms face.  Yet most firms pay 
scant attention to issues of patents and technology protection. 
Recently, the Office of Patent Administration has started setting up 
patent technology councils to foster cooperation among ROK firms and 
help counterbalance patent disputes.  In addition, it has held an 
open forum to discuss reforming the patent judgment system. 

   According to an article in the 9 February CHUGAN MAEGYONG, there 
are four ways to protect ideas using the ROK legal system:  by 
registering patents, utility models, designs, or trademarks.  It 
takes an average of 32 to 34 months to screen a patent or utility 
model application.  While South Korea ranks sixth in the world in 
the number of applications filed for patents or utility models, it 
lacks the systematic backing to help commercialize these ideas, 
according to CHUGAN.  While there are funds available to help cover 
production costs for commercializing new ideas, they only amount to 
about 200 million won ($250,000) annually. 

   The 24 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN (HKS) publishes data from 
the Office of Patent Administration showing that South Koreans 
applied for 21,459 patents in 1993, an increase of 34.5 percent over 
1992.  At the same time patent applications by foreigners dropped 
0.6 percent.  ROK citizens' applications for low-tech utility models 
totaled 31,505, a l2.8-percent increase over 1992, while foreign 
applications fell 3.9 percent.  Design and trademark applications by 
Koreans rose by 20.4 percent and 40.4 percent, respectively. 
Industrial property rights applications rose 22 percent, to 155,870, 
with corporations accounting for 57.9 percent of the total. 
According to HKS, these increases are not caused by an increased 
awareness of the concept of technology as property, but rather they 
are spurred by the growing number of industrial property disputes 
between both domestic and foreign firms. 

   The 29 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN notes that intellectual 
property rights (IPR) disputes are growing in number, and that ROK 
firms do not have sufficient ability to respond to the problem.  The 
Hanbit IPR Center recently surveyed member firms about this issue. 
Of the 153 firms responding, 69.2 percent had been involved in such 
disputes.  For electronics firms, the percentage was even higher- 
-81.3 percent.  Disputes between ROK firms accounted for 50.5 
percent of the cases, while disputes with foreign firms accounted 
for 13.1 percent.  HKS adds that 35.4 percent of the firms had had 
disputes with both domestic and foreign firms.  With regard to 
dispute resolution, HKS reports that 31.3 percent of disputes were 
resolved in court, with the judge finding for one side or the other, 
while 30.3 percent were resolved through compromise.  According to 
HKS, when a dispute involved a foreign firm, ROK firms faced such 
difficulties as a lack of data or technical information (22 
percent), insufficient knowledge of foreign laws (14 percent), and 
high costs (12 percent). 

   Most firms have paid little attention to the issue of patents or 
technology protection, reports the 15 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN. 
According to statistics from the Office of Patent Administration, 
749 manufacturers, or slightly more than 1 percent of all 
manufacturing firms, have set up offices to deal with patent issues. 
Of these, more than 96 percent employ fewer than five workers in 
their patent office.  However, some of the larger firms are devoting 
resources to this area, HKS notes.  Samsung Electronics has a 130- 
member IPR team, Goldstar has a 43-member intellectual property 
management office, and Daewoo Electronics, Goldstar Electron, and 
Hyundai Electronics are all expanding their patent-related offices. 
HKS comments that the most "anxious" organizations within 
electronics firms are those responsible for industrial property 
rights.  Firms must control their technology through patents, the 
paper suggests, and patent experts, who are scarce, should be 
quickly trained.  HKS also notes by cooperating on technology 
development, firms might reduce the burden of industrial property 
rights disputes. 

   There are already moves towards cooperation on a larger scale. 
According to the 4 February MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), "patent 
technology councils" are becoming active in high-tech areas.  These 
councils enable firms to share reciprocal licenses or patent rights. 
MKS reports that the Office of Patent Administration is considering 
cooperative "countermeasures" to international patent disputes and 
the rise in foreign countries "patent aggression," and this year 
will set up three new patent technology councils--for computers, 
electric ranges, and construction.  At the end of 1993 it set up 
nine councils, covering washing machines, electronic circuits, 
antibiotics, synthetic textiles, PVC processing technologies, 
organic and inorganic chemistry, waste disposal technology for steel 
producers, and CFC substitutes.  The patent administration believes 
that these councils could indirectly aid firms in technology 
development by supplying information on leading edge technologies. 
MKS predicts that as these councils become more active, cross- 
licensing agreements will flourish.  Another measure which would 
promote technological cooperation--a proposal to grant tax benefits 
to firms that have concluded cross-licensing agreements--is under 
consideration, according to MKS. 

   On the legal front, there are voices calling for establishing a 
"patent court," reports the 25 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN.  On 24 
January, the Korea Chamber of Commerce and Industry held a public 
forum on the issue of revising the patent judgment system.  At the 
meeting, representatives from business and technology circles 
demanded the establishment of a patent court that includes judges 
who are technical experts.  (According to the 25 January MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN, currently the Office of Patent Administration 
handles an initial patent dispute trial and the first appeal, if 
any.  If those involved in the case still disagree with the ruling, 
they may appeal to the Supreme Court for a third trial.)  Industrial 
circles question the cost, timeliness, and courts' ability to make 
technical judgments under the current system; they recommend setting 
up a patent court.  One industry representative emphasized that in 
patent judgments a factual trial is more important than a legal 
analysis.  HKS reports that patent attorneys oppose letting the 
patent office handle the first and second trials, and suggest 
establishing a patent court composed of both technical and legal 
judges.  Legal circles also oppose the patent office's role, 
maintaining that it is unconstitutional.  According to HKS, this 
group would like to see a patent department set up in the Seoul High 
Court, with the existing court handling matters and bringing in 
technical aides and advisory groups.  Finally, the Office of Patent 
Administration asserts that the current system is legal.  It does, 
however, recognize a drop in the quality of judges.  It recommends 
setting up a patent judgment court within the current framework, and 
raising the number of technical judges to improve the quality of 
judgments. 

   FEATURE:  ROK Efforts in Obtaining Foreign Commercial Technology 
Chronicled -- SUMMARY:  South Korea is using a variety of methods to 
acquire advanced foreign commercial technology, according to ROK 
press reports.  Recognizing a "gap" between the level of technology 
employed by foreign competitors and what is available domestically 
to ROK manufacturers, industry and government are jointly engaged in 
efforts to compensate by appropriating foreign know-how as the basis 
for the country's commercial S and T programs. 

   Seoul business newspapers recently published several articles 
describing efforts by the ROK Government and commercial firms to 
promote economic competitiveness through the use of foreign 
technology.  These methods reportedly include using public funds to 
indigenize foreign high-tech, hiring foreigners with technical 
expertise, collecting technical intelligence through overseas ROK 
subsidiaries, identifying and recruiting expatriate scientists, 
technical "cooperation" with foreign companies, and exploiting cash- 
strapped Russian firms for patented technology (see related article 
in PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW Vol 2 No 20, 6 Oct 93 pp 24-26). 

   The number of cases listed would increase significantly if 
reports of technical agreements, licensed production of foreign 
products, buyouts of foreign firms, "indigenized" products, new 
overseas "research" facilities, and other types of scientific 
"exchanges" (where the transfer or appropriation of foreign 
technology is implied) were also included.  The picture that emerges 
through ROK press reporting in recent months on South Korea's 
intensified quest for technology is that of a country striving to 
close the "gap" with "advanced countries" more through imitation 
than innovation.  This is reflected in the ROK press' habitual use 
of verbs such as "acquire," "accumulate," and "indigenize," while 
the term "develop" is usually restricted to broad technologies with 
little specific content or to ROK efforts to reinvent existing 
products, and the word "create" simply does not appear. 

   South Korea To 'Develop' Laser Disk Drive - The ROK Government 
and domestic computer manufacturers will jointly develop a laser 
disk drive for use with peripheral equipment in next-generation 
computers.  Work began in December 1993 with a 370-million won 
($462,500) grant from the Ministry of Trade, Industry and Energy 
(MOTIE) to the Korea Computer Research Association, which is 
managing the project with Goldstar's and Hyundai Electronics' 
participation.  The drive will be ready for domestic use and export 
by 1997. 

   Goldstar has on hand laser disk drive technology which it 
imported from Japan in 1990.  Hyundai, for its part, obtained "world 
standard" technology from its buyout of the U.S. electronics firm 
Maxter, and claims  we won't have much trouble developing it."  The 
project is also expected to give a big boost to domestic 
manufacturers of recording equipment that uses laser disk 
technology, and could lead to "indigenizing" all parts connected 
with computer memory devices.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 20 Jan 94 
p 15) 

   ROK Companies Hiring More Foreigners - The number of ROK firms 
that hire foreign specialists "to overcome the technological gap 
with competitors in advanced countries" is rising.  Even mid-size 
firms are discovering they can defeat "barricades to technology" 
erected by another country by hiring that country's nationals, 
directly or through overseas subsidiaries.  The latter are sent to 
South Korea periodically "to solve problems that occur on production 
lines and for technical consultations."  The strategy of hiring 
foreigners with technical skills to improve the competitiveness of 
ROK products is likened to "using barbarians to control barbarians." 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 Feb 94 p 14) 

   U.S.-Based Subsidiaries Collecting Technical Information - ROK 
factory automation (FA) companies are busily setting up subsidiaries 
abroad to open up new markets for their products, and to "beef up 
their collection of technical information."  Poscon's new subsidiary 
in Delaware, Poscon International Corporation (PIC), will attempt to 
market its own FA products in the United States while it "engages in 
technical information collection activities."  Samsung Aerospace 
will form two "teams" this year for FA equipment exports and control 
equipment exports, while stepping up activities at its U.S. 
subsidiary Samsung Optical America (SOA).  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 7 Feb 94 p 18) 

   'Brain Pool' To Identify, Recruit Expatriate Scientists - The 
Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST) will begin operating a 
"brain pool" this year aimed at inducing high-level scientists 
abroad to come to South Korea and help the country "acquire at an 
early date the newest science, technology, and know-how in the R and 
D stages in advanced countries, and breathe life into the domestic R 
and D scene."  The ministry will recruit 100 "overseas Korean" and 
other foreign scientists in 1994, and if the program is effective 
expand its scope in subsequent years. 

   Recruits will be leading scientists and technicians with more 
than five years postdoctoral experience in their countries of 
residence.  Exceptions will be made for personnel with world class 
achievements who lack these credentials.  South Korea will pay 
round-trip transportation, all moving expenses, and a salary higher 
than that currently received.  A review will be made every six 
months of each individual's performance as a basis for deciding 
whether to continue the contract. 

   The system will allow MOST "to make systematic use of more than 
40,000 expatriate Korean scientific personnel, including the 14,000- 
plus members of the Association of Overseas Korean Scientific and 
Technical Personnel" and "top notch" Western and former-Soviet 
scientists.  MOST is instituting the system "to deal effectively 
with the increasing reluctance of advanced countries lately to 
transfer core technology" and to help "overcome South Korea's 
inferior domestic research and educational environments."  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 25 Jan 94 p 13) 

   MOTIE Subsidizes Technical 'Cooperation' With Japan - MOTIE will 
spend 100 billion won ($125 million) between now and 1997 to support 
companies specializing in Japanese exports.  The ministry will also 
solicit greater "technical cooperation" with Japan through the "ROK- 
Japan Technical Cooperation Foundation."  Firms which shipped $1 
million in goods to Japan, and more than 50 percent of their total 
exports, will have up to two-thirds of their R and D costs 
subsidized from a "Basic Industrial Technology Development Fund." 
In addition, some 20 billion won ($25 million dollars) of the $125 
million export subsidy fund will be used to help ROK companies 
market their products in Japan. 

   Technical cooperation with Japan will be facilitated by 3.26 
billion won ($4.075 million) spent on personnel exchanges, 600 
million won ($750,000) to support joint research, 160 million won 
($200,000) on "structural activities for basic industrial 
technological cooperation," and other related subsidies totaling 4.4 
billion won ($5.5 million).  MOTIE will increase the number of 
technicians it sends to Japan for training from 197 in 1993 to more 
than 300.  Another 30 retired Japanese technicians will be invited 
to South Korea to provide "technical guidance" to ROK small and 
medium businesses (SMB's).  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 31 Jan 94 p 
4) 

   ROK Firms Importing Patented Russian Technologies - According to 
the ROK Patents Administration, 41 South Korean companies have 
applied to transfer 365 different patented Russian technologies 
since October 1993.  The ROK firms include 22 conglomerates, 14 
SMB's, and five research institutes, including the Korea Atomic 
Energy Research Institute (KAERI).  Applications by field number 157 
in electricity and electronics, 143 in chemistry, 31 in machinery 
and metals, and 34 others.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 31 Jan 94 p 
15) 

   FEATURE:  Electronics Companies Focusing on Large Screen TV's - 
SUMMARY:  South Korean electronics firms are marketing a variety of 
large screen color televisions, including conventional designs with 
screens up to 46 inches, and newer "widescreen" models which make 
use of redesigned picture tubes for a flatter chassis, according to 
Seoul press reports.  At least one ROK firm is seeking to apply 
plasma display technology to "multivision" TV's with screens more 
than eight feet wide.  The industry regards these products as 
"transitional" steps on the way to high-definition equipment now 
being developed. 

   South Korean electronics manufacturers are turning their 
attention to large screen color televisions in response to 
increasing demand for upscale commercial appliances both 
domestically and abroad.  According to the 9-16 February CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG, large color TV's held 5 percent of the ROK market in 1990, 
11 percent in 1991, 21 percent in 1992, and 27 percent last year (35 
percent by value).  At present, the most popular models are 25-inch 
sets which have 70 percent of the large screen market, 29-inch with 
25 percent of the market, and 33-inch with 4 percent.  A small 
number of homes have 42-inch and 46-inch projection TV's, the 
magazine reports. 

   These units, whose verticle-to-horizontal dimensions have a fixed 
ratio of 3:4, differ from the widescreen color TV's just now being 
marketed which are proportionately wider and based on different 
technology.  According to the 9 January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), 
South Korea's first domestic widescreen television--a 36-inch model- 
-was introduced in February 1993 by Goldstar.  A follow-up model 
with a 32-inch screen that can project as many as four pictures on 
the same screen (picture-in-picture or PIP) came out at the end of 
last year.  Goldstar expects 1994 sales of the two models to reach 
2,000 and 6,000 sets, respectively.  Samsung Electronics recently 
introduced its own 32-inch widescreen model with PIP and 
stereophonic sound, and is bringing out a 28-inch model later in 
1994.  Total sales are expected to pass 10,000.  Daewoo and Anam 
reportedly will market competitive products shortly. 

   Meanwhile, the 11 January MKS reports that Samsung Electron 
Devices has made South Korea the "second country after Japan" to 
develop a flat cathode ray tube for widescreen TV.  The company 
spent one year and 5 billion won ($6.25 million) "indigenizing" the 
part which will be used in 32-inch screens.  The tube reportedly is 
"twice as flat" as existing models.  It uses a 32.5 mm electron gun 
(down from 37.5 mm) and Samsung's "double dynamic focus" system to 
produce clear pictures.  The newspaper reports the tube will be used 
in widescreen televisions just now being produced in South Korea, 
and in the high-definition television (HDTV) sets of the future. 
The 9 January MKS states that the ROK electronics industry views 
widescreen TV as a "transitional by-product" of HDTV, which is 
expected to "dominate" the market by the year 2000. 

   In a related development, the 10 February Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
reports that Orion Electronics, a subsidiary of the Daewoo Group, 
has established a joint venture with Russia's Gas Discharge 
Equipment Research Lab (under the jurisdiction of Russia's Munitions 
Industrial Committee) to produce plasma display panels (PDP's).  The 
equipment, originally produced for Russia's aerospace program, 
reportedly is being designed for use with extra large 
("multivision") televisions with 100-inch plus displays.  According 
to the newspaper, PDP's are much narrower than conventional cathode 
ray tubes, and offer a brighter screen than liquid crystal displays 
(LCD's).  The new company, Orion Plasma Research and Production, 
will be located southeast of Moscow.  Each partner will supply half 
of the $4-million capital. 

   Government Committee Devising NAFTA Countermeasures - On 24 
January, the ROK Government's "NAFTA Countermeasures Committee" 
consisting of 17 members from trade-related agencies and industry 
met to discuss a "new strategy" that entails increasing local 
investment, moving "full-scale" into the U.S. distribution market, 
relying on trade diplomacy, and strengthening industrial 
technological "cooperation."  The committee agreed that plans to 
secure a share of the North American market will be frustrated 
unless accompanied by direct local investment.  In those sectors 
where South Korean exports lose their competitiveness to Mexican 
goods which enter the United States duty free, South Korea will 
react by reducing distribution expenses through more aggressive 
export marketing.  A fact-finding team will be sent to the United 
States in the first half of 1994 to survey the distribution market, 
while ROK companies are encouraged to participate in U.S. trade 
exhibitions and make other efforts to find local vendors. 
Competitiveness of South Korean products will also be enhanced by 
strengthening technological "cooperation" through the ROK-U.S. 
Industrial Cooperation Foundation.  In terms of diplomacy, South 
Korea will use the Uruguay Round and bilateral trade negotiating 
forums to check NAFTA's "excessive discrimination" against non- 
member countries as evidenced, for example, in its stringent 
country-of-origin criteria.  The committee plans to have a "full- 
blown NAFTA strategy" ready by March this year.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 25 Jan 94 p 6) 

   Study Compares ROK and Japanese Overseas Investment Strategies - 
The Korea Chamber of Commerce and Industry has published a 
"Comparative Study of Direct Overseas Investment Strategies by South 
Korean and Japanese Companies."  The study points out that Japan 
follows a two-part strategy of manufacturing high value-added, high- 
tech products at home while farming out medium and low value-added 
work to overseas production sites.  Also, Japan continuously shifts 
its overseas sites depending on the manufacturing cost and the 
"technological level of the product targeted for investment" so that 
no country obtains more technology than what it already has. 

   Conversely, the study notes that ROK firms appreciate less the 
need to keep technology out of other countries' hands, and are 
concerned only with raising productivity at the overseas site.  It 
adds that South Korean companies take high risks, by Japanese 
standards, in moving production to countries such as China, Vietnam, 
and Burma without making a full analysis of the situation and with 
no means to deal with unfavorable changes that may develop.  Japan's 
ability to keep high technology at home and diversify its overseas 
labor sites effectively "squeezes" ROK firms which are adept at 
doing neither.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 26 Jan 94 p 12) 

   KDI Approves of Samsung's Entry Into Auto Production - The Korea 
Development Institute (KDI), a national policy group with close ties 
to the ROK Government, recently reported it "agrees in principle" 
with Samsung's bid to enter the passenger car market.  KDI 
acknowledged that "overlapping investment" would be inefficient in 
terms of the domestic market, but that exports could expand with the 
enhanced competitiveness that Samsung's entry would help bring 
about.  KDI observed that instead of putting "unreasonable 
restrictions" on the auto industry, government should support it by 
investing in related R and D and training of personnel.  KDI's 
approval follows a similar recommendation made last November at a 
seminar of international experts.  The findings are expected to have 
a major impact on the Korea Institute for Industrial Economics and 
Trade's recommendation to the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy this April.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 17 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Samsung Develops One-Chip Integrated Circuit - Samsung 
Electronics Co. has developed a high-fidelity one-chip integrated 
circuit (IC) for wireless phones, that combines the functions of 
four standard IC's.  Using the circuit could reduce the number of 
IC's used in wireless phones from 12-13 to two or three, and reduce 
the phone's components by 25-30 percent.  This could pave the way 
for miniaturization of wireless phones.  (Seoul YONHAP 0133 GMT 17 
Feb 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Hyundai Motors Opens Car Institute - Hyundai Motors recently 
opened a research institute at the Korea Advanced Institute of 
Science and Technology (KAIST) to develop high-tech auto 
technologies and groom skilled workers.  The institute, named 
"Smarveh" (Smart Vehicle Laboratory), is manned by five KAIST 
professors specializing in machinery and 15 KAIST researchers.  The 
institute will concentrate on developing cleaner-running, quieter, 
and safer cars. It will also focus on producing more than 1O auto 
experts with masters-degree level diplomas each year.  Hyundai 
supplied research equipment worth 200 million won ($250,000) and 300 
million won ($375,000) in cash to the institute.  (Seoul THE KOREA 
TIMES 20 Feb 94 p 8) Seoul Bureau 

   Seoul, Beijing Seeking Industrial Alliance - The ROK Government 
will seek an industrial cooperation agreement with China.  For South 
Korea, the main areas of cooperation would include aircraft, 
automobiles, digital telephone exchanges, and nuclear power plants, 
while China is interested in high-definition television (HDTV), 
facsimile, and large-screen televisions.  South Korea has already 
announced an aircraft development plan, and China is expected to be 
invited to participate in it.  In the automotive sector, South Korea 
has asked China to allow ROK car imports, and will encourage ROK 
parts producers to invest in China.  The ROK Government is also 
eager to become involved in the modernization of China's telephone 
networks.  Nuclear power is another promising area of cooperation as 
China constructs new nuclear power plants.  The Korea Electric Power 
Corporation (KEPCO) has signed an agreement to provide operational 
and management services to a nuclear power plant in Guangdong 
Province.  (Seoul TONGA ILBO 18 Feb 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Companies Withdraw From Indonesia Because of Rising Labor Costs - 
ROK companies are closing their plants in Indonesia due to wage 
hikes.  The average daily wage in Indonesia increased from $1.05- 
$1.33 last year to $1.67 recently, an increase of 25 to 60 percent. 
ROK companies plan to move their plants to Vietnam or China, where 
labor costs are lower.  Samsung closed its sewing plant in west 
Jakarta at the end of last year and is moving to close five other 
plants.  Sokwang closed one of two plants in Indonesia, and Lucky- 
Goldstar International is considering selling its plant.  (Seoul 
HANGUK ILBO 21 Feb 94 p 5) Seoul Bureau 

   Plant Exports to China on Increase - ROK companies are increasing 
plant exports to China as economic cooperation between the two 
countries is expected to "improve drastically" following President 
Kim Yong-sam's visit to China.  According to the Korea Export and 
Import Bank, major ROK companies are expanding from small-volume 
trade to large-scale plant projects in China.  The bank has received 
applications for deferred payment for nine projects with a total 
value of $167 million.  Plant exports range from port facilities to 
telecommunications cable equipment and railroads.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Feb 94 p 4) Seoul Bureau 

   Companies To Participate in Telephone Business in Russia - Dacom 
and Goldstar Data Communications will sign a contract with Russia on 
25 February to establish a joint communication corporation that will 
provide local phone service to Russia's Maritime Province.  Dacom 
will invest 1,440 million won ($1.8 million) in the project and hold 
a 45-percent share in the venture, while Goldstar Data 
Communications will hold 5 percent and six Russian companies will 
have a 50-percent share.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINNUN 25 Feb p 11) 
Seoul Bureau 

   Goldstar Signs Communications Agreement With Romania - Goldstar 
Information and Communications has signed a turnkey agreement to 
supply $50 million worth of telecommunications equipment to Rom 
Telecom of Romania.  The equipment will be used to modernize the 
telephone network in Prahova Province, a project that will cost $75 
million.  The ROK's Economic Development and Cooperation Fund (EDCF) 
will provide $50 million in loans to help the Romanian Government 
purchase the equipment.  Goldstar will supply two types of digital 
telephone exchanges (TDX), STAREX-TD1 for small cities and STAREX- 
IMS for rural villages.  The firm will also provide optical 
transmission equipment, microwave equipment, and cables.  Goldstar's 
$50-million contract is the largest TDX contract ever for a ROK 
firm.  (Seoul THE KOREA HERALD 24 Feb 94 p 8) Seoul Bureau 

   China Emerges as Major Export Market for ROK Textiles - China has 
emerged as a major textile market for ROK companies.  According to 
the Korea Federation of Textile Industries, textile exports to China 
between January and November 1993 totaled $756 million, a 71.4- 
percent increase compared to the same period in 1992.  This makes 
China the fifth largest export market for ROK textiles, or the 
second largest if exports through Hong Kong are included.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 23 Feb 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA - FEATURE:  Government Urged To Reduce 
Cost of Economy -- SUMMARY:  Jakarta press sources recently reported 
the views of several economists on Indonesia's "high cost economy." 
These economists stress the need to stimulate overall economic 
activity, reduce production costs, and attain better productivity 
and efficiency, so that Indonesia can achieve economic growth as 
well as become more competitive in overseas markets. 

   Sumitro Djojohadikusumo, President Suharto's senior economic 
advisor, recently expressed his concern over Indonesia's high cost 
economy and his remarks were cited in several major Jakarta dailies 
on 22 January.  Sumitro's analysis of the economic situation, as 
reported in BISNIS INDONESIA, KOMPAS, SUARA PEMBARUAN, and MERDEKA, 
is based on a "capital-output ratio," using quantitative and 
empirical data, as well as statistical figures from the Central 
Bureau of Statistics.  Sumitro's conclusion is that Indonesia's 
economic development has been "less efficient and less effective" 
compared with other ASEAN countries whose economies are 
"structurally similar."  The papers also note that Sumitro 
attributes this "undesirable situation" to the "large amounts of 
waste and losses," caused by mismanagement; investments in 
infrastructure that have slow or little yield; "incompetence" in 
planning, operating, and maintaining investment projects; and 
"irregularities" such as graft. 

   BISNIS INDONESIA reports that during Indonesia's fifth Five-Year 
Development Plan (1989-1994), public and private investments 
amounted to 33.4 percent of the national income, with annual 
economic growth at 6.8 percent.  Based on these figures, the 
incremental capital-output ratio (ICOR) is 33.4 : 6.8 = 4.9 or 5. 
This ICOR, Sumitro points out, is "somewhat high" compared to the 
ratios for other ASEAN countries, which generally range from 3 to 
3.5.  Sumitro suggests that a reduction in the cost of the economy 
will ultimately result in Indonesia's becoming more competitive 
abroad and in a higher economic growth for the country; he adds that 
if the ICOR during the second stage of Indonesia's long-term 
development cycle could be reduced to 3.5, and if investments remain 
at 33.4 percent of national income, Indonesia could achieve an 
annual growth of 9.5 percent (33.4 : 3.5). 

   Sumitro's assessment of the country's economic situation 
coincides with that of Rizal Ramly, executive director of the 
economic, industrial, and trade consulting firm Ekonit.  According 
to a 23 January KOMPAS editorial, Rizal believes that new measures 
to directly address Indonesia's high cost economy should be worked 
out and implemented in order to improve the country's 
competitiveness in overseas markets. 

   Economists Priasmoro Prawiroardjo and Hadi Soesastro of the 
Center for Strategic and International Studies share Rizal's view 
that a new set of deregulation policies is deeded.  According to the 
22 January KOMPAS, Hadi believes that improving the business climate 
would play an important role in stimulating overall economic 
activity and in improving efficiency in the industrial sector, while 
Priasmoro views production efficiency as the key problem that 
Indonesian exporters must overcome to penetrate the world market. 
Priasmoro stresses that cutting back on production cost alone will 
not be enough and that improved macroeconomic conditions are also 
necessary.  Moreover, he asserts that implementation of the 
agreements reached at the Uruguay Round will pose more challenges 
than opportunities to the Indonesian industrial sector.  He also 
points out that Indonesia's electronic industrialists are already 
concerned about the competition that will come from AFTA (Asean Free 
Trade Area).  They fear that under the Common Effective Preferential 
Tariff (CEPT) plan of AFTA, the market will be saturated with 
electronic products from Singapore, Malaysia, and Thailand.  And 
because of the time-consuming procedures and "unpredictable costs" 
associated with investing in Indonesia (such as "illegal levies" 
that have to be paid to obtain business licenses), these 
industrialists predict that other Indonesian products have little 
chance of getting a share of the international market, KOMPAS 
reports. 

   FEATURE:  Workers Strike as Government Enforces Minimum Wage 
Decree -- SUMMARY:  Several Jakarta newspapers report that thousands 
of employees went on strike recently to demand better treatment by 
their employers and an increase to the $2 daily minimum wage 
recently set by the government for Jakarta and its surrounding 
areas. 

   The 4 February ANGKATAN BERSENJATA and SUARA PEMBARUAN report 
that thousands of employees of several companies in the Tangerang 
area went on strike three weeks after a ministerial decree on an 
increase in daily minimum wage went into effect on 1 January.  The 
strikes occurred after employers turned down the employees' demand 
for a 26-percent increase in the daily minimum wage--which is 
approximately $2--set by the government.  In Bekasi, 30 km east of 
Jakarta, 1,200 workers from five companies went on strike early last 
week, according to the 7 February ANGKATAN BERSENJATA.  In addition 
to a salary increase, workers demanded that companies grant them 
better benefits and special allowances.  The paper also states that 
reports from Bandung indicate that hundreds of employees went on 
strike for the same reasons as their counterparts in Bekasi, while 
hundreds of workers from Bogor demonstrated in front of the Ministry 
of Manpower.  The demonstration prompted a government investigation 
into allegations that employers are violating the minimum wage 
regulations, ANGKATAN BERSENJATA says. 

   SUARA PEMBARUAN notes that most employers have proposed that the 
decree enforcement be postponed until April, citing the need for 
more time to adjust their payrolls, not only in connection with the 
wage hike but also for the annual "Lebaran" (festivities at the end 
of the fasting month) bonus in March.  The paper also quotes 
Tangerang Regent Saifullah Abdulrahman who said that out of 870 
companies in the region, at least 80 small and medium firms cannot 
afford to pay their workers a daily minimum wage of $2.  Saifullah 
stated that some of the firms have even filed a protest to the 
Ministry of Manpower and have enclosed their financial statements. 
However, the paper continues, Manpower Minister Abdul Latief has 
stated that based on the outcome of a recent survey on cost 
structure, companies are in fact capable of and should be paying 
their workers more.  Latief said that labor cost averages only 9.8 
percent of total production cost, which is "too small."  He also 
asserted that, according to the All-Indonesia Labor Union (SPSI), 
some companies in the shoe industry have spent only 2 percent of 
their total operational budget on labor.  SPSI General Secretary 
Bomer Pasaribu attributes this "deplorable situation" to the fact 
that employers have always regarded wages as part of production 
cost, subject to reduction, and hence wages have always been 
suppressed. 

   Minister Latief warns businesses that more strikes will occur 
prior to Lebaran, unless employers become more responsive to 
workers' demand for better pay and better benefits, ANGKATAN 
BERSENJATA reports.  The paper also quotes Aburizal Bakrie, chairman 
of the Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industry, who called on 
all employers to willingly comply with the minimum wage regulation. 
Bakrie said that "workers are assets, not production tools," and 
that the minimum wage is set at "a low level so companies won't be 
burdened." 

   According to the 8 February KOMPAS, the government is determined 
to make companies comply with the minimum wage regulation.  The 
paper says that President Suharto has ordered his cabinet ministers 
to make a list of the companies that violate the regulation and/or 
operate without a labor union, and to take the necessary steps 
against them.  The president has stated that employers should not be 
concerned with profits only, but that they must also pay attention 
to the rights and welfare of workers, the paper reports. 

   Central Bank Needs $400-Million 'Standby Loan' - The Bank of 
Indonesia (Central Bank) recently announced that Indonesia has 
tasked six international banks to come up with a $400-million 
"standby loan."  The six banks include Banque Nationale de Paris, 
Bank of Tokyo in Hong Kong, Chase Manhattan Asia, Dresdner, 
Industrial Bank of Japan, and Long Term Credit Bank, Asia. 

   The seven-year loan will be signed in March, with a utility 
period of five years after the loan is signed.  It will be repaid in 
five installments every six months, starting at the end of the first 
five years.  The interest for the first two years is set at 0.75 
percent above LIBOR (London Interbank Offered Rate), and in the 
third year, the interest will increase to 0.875 percent above LIBOR. 

   Former Finance Minister Frans Seda said the loan will only be 
used in the event the government is unable to pay for non-oil/gas 
imports, or as a safeguard for the balance of payments.  (Jakarta 
KOMPAS 28 Jan 94 pp 1, 5) 

   Government Discontinues 'Protection' of Steel Industry - Minister 
of Industry Tunky Ariwibowo recently announced that the government 
will no longer "protect" the national steel industry, even in the 
event of declining world steel prices.  Ariwibowo said the decision 
is meant to force the national company P.T. Krakatau Steel to become 
more efficient and more competitive.  This decision is also 
necessary to counteract a claim by the United States that Indonesia 
is dumping its steel in the international market, the minister said. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 28 Jan 94 p 3) 

   P.T. PAL To Shift Production Focus - A recent report issued by 
P.T. PAL, a state-owned shipyard in Surabaya, states that within two 
years, the company intends to stop producing small ships in the 900- 
4,200 dead weight ton (dwt) range, and will start building war ships 
and larger ships up to 40,000 dwt.  The report does not specify what 
type of war ships P.T. PAL expects to produce, but the larger ships 
will include coal carriers, passenger ships, container carriers up 
to 2,700 twenty feet equivalent unit (teu), and oil tankers up to 
30,000 dwt.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 4 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Increase in French Investments Reported - The Capital Investment 
Board recently reported that French investments in Indonesia in 1993 
registered a total of $431 million, a 68.3-percent increase over the 
previous year.  Most of the investments were in the chemical, 
electronic, and gas industries, and in the hotel, banking, and 
financial sectors.  (Jakarta ANGKATAN BERSENJATA 21 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Agriculture's Contribution to GDP Drops to 19 Percent - 
Agriculture Minister Syarifudin Baharsyah recently said that the 
agriculture sector's contribution to GDP has dropped to 19 percent, 
causing a loss of jobs in the sector and particularly in farming. 
Syarifudin expects the figure to continue to drop, down to as low as 
15 percent eventually.  (Jakarta ANTARA 1032 GMT 28 Feb 94) Bangkok 
Bureau 

   MALAYSIA:  Contract for Asia Pacific Cable Network Signed - Nine 
Asian telecommunication companies have recently signed a $7.16- 
million contract with Fugro Survey Private Ltd. to study the 
region's optic fiber submarine cable system for the Asia Pacific 
Cable Network (APCN).  The nine companies include Singapore Telecom, 
Telekom Malaysia Berhad, Communications Authority of Thailand, Hong 
Kong Telecom International Ltd., Indonesia's Indosat, Taiwan's 
International Telecommunication Development Corp., Japan's Kokusai 
Denshin Denwa Company Ltd., the Philippines' Long Distance Telephone 
Company, and Korea Telecom.  The study is designed to find a safe 
and economically viable route for the APCN.  Expected to be put into 
service in 1996, the APCN will comprise two submarine cable systems: 
the first system will connect Japan, Korea, Taiwan, Hong Kong, the 
Philippines, Malaysia, and Singapore, and the second will link 
Thailand, Malaysia, Singapore, and Indonesia.  (Kuala Lumpur BERNAMA 
0437 GMT 24 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   PHILIPPINES:  Proposals for Satellite Project Reported - 
Transportation and Communication Undersecretary Josefina Lichauco 
recently stated that the Philippines has begun to receive proposals 
from various private consortiums for a project to launch its own 
satellite or to lease a satellite from another country.  Lichauco 
stressed that the government will facilitate the project which will 
be under a government build-operate-transfer arrangement, with the 
consortiums financing and overseeing construction of the entire 
project.  The consortiums will then be given the right to operate 
the project for a specified period in order to recoup their 
investments.  The prospective satellite firm will be a 60-percent 
Filipino-owned public utility and the rest of the equity will be 
open to foreign partners. 

   To date, Manila has received proposals from Russia-based Global 
Information Systems, Malaysia's Measat, Thailand's Shinawatra group, 
and U.S.-based Rimsat.  Other companies that have expressed an 
interest include Europe's Arianespace and Matra Marconi, Hong Kong's 
Asiasat, and U.S. companies such as Hughes Space and Communications, 
Martin Marietta, and Panamsat.  (Manila BALITA 10 Feb 94 p 2, 11 Feb 
94 p 3) 

   SINGAPORE:  'Largest' Petrochemical Investment Announced - A 
partnership of leading chemical firms from Europe, Japan, and the 
United States will invest over $1.875 billion in the second 
petrochemical complex on Ayer Merbau and Seraya islands.  It will be 
the single largest foreign investment in Singapore.  The project is 
expected to be completed in the second quarter of 1997 and will 
include Singapore companies such as the Petrochemical Corporation of 
Singapore, the Polyolefin Company, Denka Singapore, and Seraya 
Chemicals Singapore.  (Singapore Singapore Broadcasting Corporation 
1100 GMT 1 Mar 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   THAILAND:  Rice Sale to North Korea Reported - Deputy Prime 
Minister Amnuai Wirawan said recently that Thailand will sell North 
Korea 50,000 tons of rice under a two-year credit plan.  Thailand 
had previously agreed to sell 200,000 tons of rice, but North Korea 
has delayed issuing a letter of credit.  To maintain the 
relationship, Thailand has decided to proceed with a lesser sale at 
this time.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 23 Feb 94 p 20) Bangkok Bureau 

   Cabinet Approves Soybean Import - The cabinet has approved the 
import of 98,000 tons of soybean, following the recommendation of 
the Soybean and Other Oil Crops Policy Committee.  Some 5,000 tons 
will be imported from Laos and 10,000 tons from Cambodia.  The 
imports must be completed by July and no imports are allowed during 
March or April.  Current annual domestic demand for soybean is 1.2 
million tons, while production is only about 400,000 tons.  Thailand 
spends about $160 million annually on soybean imports.  (Bangkok 
Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 2 Mar 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Losses in Rice Export Earnings Reported -- 
SUMMARY:  A Hanoi press report notes that Vietnamese rice dealers 
suffered losses of about $2 million in rice export earnings in 
October 1993, mainly because of a shortage of funds and stiff 
competition among the dealers.  The same report shows that Vietnam 
currently ranks third among world rice exporters and points out the 
need for changes in the State's management of rice export. 

   According to a 22 August 1993 Hanoi VNA report, between 1989 and 
1992, Vietnam exported 5.76 million metric tons of rice worth over 
$1 billion.  The 5 January THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM notes that in 
the last three years, the country has exported a yearly average of 
about 1.7 million metric tons of rice, which brought in revenues 
that are second only to earnings from  crude oil export.  The 6-12 
January TUAN BAO QUOC TE points out that although Vietnam currently 
ranks third among world rice exporters, rice dealers have registered 
losses of about $2 million in October 1993, in exporting more than 
100,000 metric tons of rice. 

   TUAN BAO QUOC TE (TBQT) suggests that one of the main reasons for 
the losses in rice export earnings is the stiff competition between 
rice dealers, resulting in rising domestic purchase prices and 
falling export prices.  Another reason cited by the newspaper is 
poor management" by the State.  Despite a government directive to 
reduce the number of principal rice exporters to 17, there were 
still over 40 exporters in November 1993, since any firm with a 
contract listing prices commensurate with government prices could 
obtain an export permit, including those who did not have storage 
space or processing mills. 
   TBQT also cites the shortage of funds used to buy rice as a 
problem.  Some $200 million were actually required to purchase rice 
in the Mekong River delta, but the largest amount received was only 
$740,000 and the smallest $45,000, while small enterprises received 
only 10 percent of the funds needed.  According to TBQT, few firms 
want to sign big contracts and take out loans to buy rice for export 
ahead of time, but they will rush out to make rice purchases only 
when customers offer letters of credit and ships start to come in. 

   TBQT reports that Vietnamese rice export increased from 1.42 
million metric tons in 1989 to 1.95 million metric tons in 1992, and 
totaled 1.7 million metric tons in 1993.  The number of countries 
who have signed purchase contracts with Vietnam has also increased 
from 24 in 1992 to 50 in 1993.  The quality of the exported rice is 
reportedly improving each year, with an increasingly smaller 
percentage of broken rice.  Currently, prices for Vietnamese rice 
are $50-$60 less per metric ton than Thai rice of the same quality. 

   TBQT concludes that to achieve success in rice export, the State 
needs to improve its management system, strengthen the Union of 
Grain Exporters, and give rice exporters regular guidance on 
domestic and international trade regulations in order to avoid the 
kind of losses experienced in the last quarter of 1993. 

   Government To Approve Foreign Construction of Infrastructure 
Projects - The Vietnamese Government will reportedly prepare 
legislation to implement a system whereby foreign companies will 
undertake the construction of infrastructural projects on a turnkey, 
or "build, operate, and transfer" (BOT) basis.  This "BOT-style" 
system involves entrusting all matters concerning infrastructural 
projects to foreign companies, from financing to construction and 
actual operation.  The government has "great expectations" for this 
system, since it will not have to provide financing and because 
foreign firms will contribute management and other knowhow to 
Vietnam.  China and Southeast Asian countries have successfully used 
the BOT system to build power-generating facilities and highways. 

   In the first half of March, the Vietnam State Committee for 
Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) plans to hold a "forum on BOT- 
style investment" in Hanoi for foreign financial organs and 
development companies.  At that time the SCCI will announce 
regulations concerning BOT bidding and contracting. 

   However, there have been "many problems" with the BOT system 
involving contracts let by government agencies and the companies 
signing them, as exemplified by the recent withdrawal of Japanese 
companies from an expressway construction project in Thailand.  In 
Vietnam's case, there probably will be difficulties over the long 
term in collecting fees from completed generating plants, highways, 
and bridges.  And even if some financing consortiums are formed, 
they will adopt a "cautious stance" regarding involvement in 
Vietnam.  It appears that initially, banks controlled by overseas 
Chinese and French banks will be the main participants in financing 
consortiums.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 24 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Government To Develop 'Core' Groups of State Enterprises - 
According to an article in the 19 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN by 
Makoto Suzuki, the paper's Hanoi correspondent, the Vietnamese 
Government has decided to make the development of "core enterprise 
groups" from among major state enterprises a "pillar" of its 
economic restructuring program.  Although the government has been 
making efforts to nurture private companies as part of its economic 
reform measures, private companies still remain "weak."  Thus, the 
government's plan is to use selected "core" state enterprises as 
"locomotives" of economic growth. 

   As soon as possible, a list of candidate firms from among 
enterprises currently under the control of government agencies will 
be presented to Prime Minister Vo Van Khiet.  Then a "limited 
number" of core groups will be established--more will be designated 
later--and they will be removed from the control of ministries and 
agencies, "placed directly under the government," run 
"experimentally," and gradually will be expanded. 

   Suzuki writes that as explained by Le Xuan Trinh, minister and 
director of the Government Office, these core enterprises will be 
developed into "powerful" groups with capital levels of "several 
trillion" dong (several hundred million dollars).  Also, each group 
will have "several dozen umbrella companies" under it.  According to 
Trinh, companies under the Energy Ministry and the postal and 
communications authorities "will be the first" to be transferred. 

   Reorganizing state enterprises is one of the government's basic 
policy goals, Suzuki notes, along with privatization and 
reorganizing loss-making enterprises.  In this process, developing 
core enterprise groups appears to be a "precise" policy of 
selectively developing "superior" state enterprises. 

   Banking Association To Include Domestic, Foreign Banks - Vietnam 
will establish a Banking Association by mid-1994 that is expected to 
bring together various domestic financial institutions as well as 
foreign banks operating in Vietnam.  The government intends to use 
their views in modernizing Vietnam's financial system. 

   There are four types of financial institutions in Vietnam, in 
addition to Vietnam's State Bank--state-owned commercial banks, 
private joint-venture banks, credit cooperatives, and finance 
companies (nonbanks). There are "more than 20 large and medium-size" 
state-owned commercial banks and private joint-venture banks.  About 
40 domestic financial organizations intend to join the association. 
As for foreign banks, there are more than 30 operating in Vietnam 
through branches, joint ventures, or resident offices. 

   Among Japanese banks, Tokyo and Sakura Banks, which already have 
resident offices in Ho Chi Minh City, are expected to join the new 
association.  Also, it is anticipated that American banks will 
quickly enter Vietnam now that the economic embargo has been lifted. 
However, since foreign banks are "uneasy" about doing business in 
Vietnam because of the country's undeveloped financial markets, 
Japanese and other foreign banks hope to use the Banking Association 
to propose ways the Vietnamese Government might regulate the 
industry.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 22 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Finance Ministry Personnel To Study Japan's Securities Industry - 
In June, Nikko Securities, one of Japan's "big four" securities 
companies, will invite 15 employees of Vietnam's Finance Ministry to 
study Japan's stock exchange regulatory system.  Ten members of the 
group will be regular ministry employees and five are students that 
will be joining the ministry.  During their month-long stay, the 
group will visit the Tokyo Stock Exchange, the Ministry of Finance, 
securities firms, and listed companies to study market regulations, 
regulation of securities sales, and market settlement issues. 

   Vietnam is planning to establish a stock exchange in Ho Chi Minh 
City, but whether the exchange will actually be opened this year, 
given delays in preparing its regulatory systems and slowness in 
issuing stock of government-owned companies, has become a "delicate" 
issue. 

   Anticipating that American investment banks will begin operations 
in Vietnam with the lifting of economic sanctions, Japanese 
securities firms and banks "are quickly establishing close personal 
ties (jimmyaku) with the Vietnamese Government so as not to lag 
behind."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 21 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Joint Venture With French, Chinese Firms To Produce Nylon Cords - 
The Hanoi Industrial Textile Factory, France's Rhone-Poulenc Chimie, 
and China's Heavenly Horse Tire Fabric Company have formed the Thang 
Long Nylon Company, a 20-year joint venture in Hanoi to manufacture 
nylon cords for bicycle and motor vehicle tires.  The new venture 
was licensed in mid-December 1993, with an investment capital of 
$4.76 million.  Prescribed capital is $3.33 million, of which the 
Vietnamese company is contributing 34 percent while the other two 
partners are contributing 33 percent each.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 1 Jan 94 
p 6) 

   Jewelry Joint Venture Formed With Japanese Company - The 
Vietnamese Gemstone Company (Vinagemco) and Japan's Kotobuki 
Holdings Company Ltd. have formed Vijagem, a 30-year joint venture 
in Hanoi to process gems tones and to make and sell jewelry.  The 
new venture was licensed in October 1993 and is capitalized at $2 
million.  Prescribed capital is also $2 million, of which the 
Japanese company is contributing 70 percent.  (Hanoi QUAN DOI NHAN 
DAN 3 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Joint Venture With Philippine Firm To Build Commercial Complex - 
The Merchant Marine Center (under the Vietnam Maritime Department) 
and the Philippines' Imex Pan-Pacific have formed the Hanoi Marine 
Commercial Center, a 30-year joint venture in Hanoi to build a 
commercial complex--containing a hotel and offices--and to provide 
merchant marine services.  The new venture was licensed in late 
October 1993, with an investment capital of $12 million.  Prescribed 
capital is $6.02 million, of which the Philippine company is 
contributing 51 percent.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 4 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Joint Venture With Singaporean Company To Provide Hotel Services 
- The Vietnam Tourism Company in Ho Chi Minh City and Singapore's 
Koh Brothers Building and Civil Engineering Contractor Pte., Ltd. 
have formed Vina Viet-Sinh Ltd., a 15-year joint venture in Ho Chi 
Minh City to provide hotel services.  The new venture was licensed 
in October 1993, with a listed investment capital of $3.2 million. 
Prescribed capital is $2.4 million, of which the Singaporean firm is 
contributing 70 percent.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 3 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Joint Venture With Malaysian Firm To Produce Glass Containers - 
The Khanh Hoi Glass Factory in Ho Chi Minh City and Malaysia's 
Malaya Glass Berhad have formed Malaya-Vietnam Glass Ltd., a 30-year 
joint venture in Ho Chi Minh City to produce glass containers for 
domestic consumption and export.  The new venture was licensed in 
late October 1993, with an investment capital of $22 million. 
Prescribed capital is $15.47 million, of which the Malaysian firm is 
contributing 70 percent.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 8 Jan 94 p 6) 

   Decrease in Coal Export Noted - Coal export in 1993 totaled 
nearly 1.25 million metric tons, about 350,000 metric tons less than 
in 1992.  Competition among various units brought down prices by 5 
to 7 percent compared with 1992.  Coal's export value has also 
decreased by nearly $20 million.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 
23-29 Dec 93 p 5) 

   Singapore's Liang Court Holdings To Invest in Apartment Complex - 
Peregrine Capital Vietnam Ltd. and Singapore's Liang Court Holdings 
plan to build a $30-million, 150-unit apartment complex in Ho Chi 
Minh City.  Liang Court owns 60 percent of the project and the 
Vietnamese firm the remainder.  (Singapore BUSINESS TIMES 21 Feb 94 
p 18) Bangkok Bureau 

   Hanoi Launches First Paging Service - Hanoi Post and 
Telecommunications recently launched its first paging service, with 
technical assistance from Hong Kong's ABC Communication (Holding) 
Ltd.  The service has numeric or alpha-numeric pagers capable of 
storing up to 98 messages and 280 characters and receiving messages 
in Chinese characters as well as in the Roman alphabet.  The Hanoi 
paging center has 170 subscribers and charges a monthly fee of $8. 
The subscription fee for Ho Chi Minh City is $10 a month.  (Hanoi 
VNA 0555 GMT 19 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Hong Kong Firm To Invest in Da Lat Infrastructure - Hong Kong's 
Strategic Development International Corporation will invest in a 
$150-million project to improve Da Lat's infrastructure, including 
roads and power and water supplies.  (Hanoi VNA 0648 GMT 21 Feb 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   PetroVietnam To Increase Production - The Vietnam Oil and Gas 
Corporation, PetroVietnam, expects to produce 7.1 million tons of 
crude oil this year, up by 300,000 tons from the previous year.  The 
increase is attributed to an estimated 6.7 million-ton yield from 
the Bach Ho oil field and a 0.3 million-ton output from the Rong and 
Dai Hung fields.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 22 Feb 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Government To Increase Cement Production - Six ministries and 21 
provinces are committed to increase cement production using vertical 
furnaces.  Nearly 35 feasibility studies to upgrade or build new 
furnaces at a total investment of $670,000 have been done.  Experts 
estimate that these vertical furnaces will produce 650,000 tons of 
cement this year and 2.5 million tons in 1996.  (Hanoi VNA 1444 GMT 
19 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Peanut Exports Put Vietnam Third Among Exporting Countries - 
Vietnam exported about 150,000 tons of peanuts last year, ranking 
third among peanut exporting countries.  This year Vietnam expects 
to produce 275,000 tons of peanuts, including 200,000 tons for 
export.  (Hanoi VNA 0611 GMT 1 Mar 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   First Phase of Hoa Binh Hydroelectric Plant Completed - A 670-ton 
rotor was recently installed at the Hoa Binh Hydroelectric Power 
Plant, marking the end of the first phase of the plant's 
construction, which has taken over 10 years.  The rotor will 
increase the plant's output to 1,920 mw, as planned.  (Hanoi Voice 
of Vietnam Network 1100 GMT 25 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Rice Joint Venture Accord With Hong Kong Company Signed - Long 
An, Tien Giang, Dong Thap, and An Giang Provinces have recently 
signed a 50-year joint-venture agreement with a Hong Kong company to 
produce and process rice.  The $10-million project includes the 
planting of special rice varieties on 30,000 hectares in southern 
Vietnam, and the construction of a processing mill with an annual 
capacity of 90,000 tons.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 2 Mar 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Construction of Sulfuric Acid Factory Reported - Construction of 
a sulfuric acid factory--a joint venture between  Indonesia's Unggul 
Indah Corporation (UIC) and Vietnam Company Ltd.--in Dong Nai 
Province has begun.  The $7.5-million, UIC-funded factory will have 
an annual capacity to produce 30,000 tons of dodecyl benzene 
sulfuric acid, the primary ingredient in soap powders and laundry 
detergents.  The factory will begin operating in September and will 
provide jobs for 100 workers.  (Hanoi VNA 1404 GMT 26 Feb 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Vietnam Airlines Leases Two Airbus Jets From Air France - Vietnam 
Airlines will lease two Airbus A320 passenger jets from Air France 
to meet an expected 40-percent rise in passengers over the next few 
years.  The two jets will bring the total of Airbus and Boeing 
aircraft leased by the airline to seven.  Vietnam Airlines has been 
replacing its aging fleet of 20 Soviet-built planes with more modern 
jets.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 26 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 
EAG/9MAR94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP JEG 10/0134Z MAR 

